4594 | together (adverb): with each other, close or touching | loc: ensemble
  EN TS: They are crying together!
  fr TS: Ils pleurent ensemble !
  EN FS: They are dancing together!
  fr FS: Ils dansent ensemble !
  EN TP: crying together
  fr TP: pleurer ensemble
  EN FP: singing together
  fr FP: chanter ensemble
4595 | cry (verb): to shed tears because of sadness or pain | loc: pleurer
  EN TS: He can't stop crying.
  fr TS: Il n'arrête pas de pleurer.
  EN FS: He can't stop laughing.
  fr FS: Il n'arrête pas de rire.
  EN TP: crying on the sofa
  fr TP: pleurer sur le canapé
  EN FP: crying in the shower
  fr FP: pleurer sous la douche
4596 | nose (noun): the organ of smell in the middle of the face | loc: nez
  EN TS: She is blowing her nose.
  fr TS: Elle se mouche le nez.
  EN FS: She is blowing a bubble.
  fr FS: Elle fait une bulle.
  EN TP: blowing her nose
  fr TP: se moucher le nez
  EN FP: holding her nose
  fr FP: se boucher le nez
4597 | culture (noun): the tastes in art and manners of a social group | loc: culture
  EN TS: This culture loves dancing.
  fr TS: Cette culture adore danser.
  EN FS: This culture loves football.
  fr FS: Cette culture adore le foot.
  EN TP: a folk culture festival
  fr TP: un festival de culture populaire
  EN FP: a culture of fast food
  fr FP: une culture du fast-food
4598 | huge (adjective): unusually great in size | loc: immense
  EN TS: Her coffee mug is huge now!
  fr TS: Sa tasse de café est immense maintenant !
  EN FS: Her teapot is huge now!
  fr FS: Sa théière est immense maintenant !
  EN TP: a huge coffee mug
  fr TP: une immense tasse de café
  EN FP: a huge coffee bill
  fr FP: une immense addition au café
4599 | payment (noun): a sum of money paid | loc: paiement
  EN TS: Payment in coins and notes.
  fr TS: Paiement en pièces et en billets.
  EN FS: Payment in notes only.
  fr FS: Paiement en billets uniquement.
  EN TP: a payment in cash
  fr TP: un paiement en espèces
  EN FP: a payment by card
  fr FP: un paiement par carte
4600 | exchange (verb): to give something and receive something back | loc: échanger
  EN TS: He is exchanging money.
  fr TS: Il échange de l'argent.
  EN FS: He is exchanging hats.
  fr FS: Il échange des chapeaux.
  EN TP: exchanging foreign money
  fr TP: échanger des devises
  EN FP: exchanging gifts
  fr FP: échanger des cadeaux
4601 | arrange (verb): to put things into a proper order | loc: arranger
  EN TS: She is arranging the cushions.
  fr TS: Elle arrange les coussins.
  EN FS: She is arranging the books.
  fr FS: Elle arrange les livres.
  EN TP: arranging sofa cushions
  fr TP: arranger les coussins du canapé
  EN FP: arranging a meeting
  fr FP: arranger un rendez-vous
4602 | search (verb): to search or seek something | loc: fouiller
  EN TS: Customs is searching her bag.
  fr TS: La douane fouille son sac.
  EN FS: Customs is searching her car.
  fr FS: La douane fouille sa voiture.
  EN TP: searching a suitcase
  fr TP: fouiller une valise
  EN FP: searching for a lost dog
  fr FP: chercher un chien perdu
4603 | road (noun): an open public way for travel by vehicles | loc: route
  EN TS: The road winds through hills.
  fr TS: La route serpente entre les collines.
  EN FS: The road winds through a city.
  fr FS: La route serpente à travers une ville.
  EN TP: a winding mountain road
  fr TP: une route de montagne sinueuse
  EN FP: a winding mountain river
  fr FP: une rivière de montagne sinueuse
4605 | wire (noun): a metal line that carries electricity | loc: fil électrique
  EN TS: The wire is sparking.
  fr TS: Le fil électrique fait des étincelles.
  EN FS: The wheel is sparking.
  fr FS: La roue fait des étincelles.
  EN TP: an overhead tram wire
  fr TP: un fil électrique de tram
  EN FP: a farm wire fence
  fr FP: une clôture en fil de fer
4606 | tower (noun): a tall narrow building or part of one | loc: tour
  EN TS: He is looking up at a tower.
  fr TS: Il lève les yeux vers une tour.
  EN FS: He is looking up at a plane.
  fr FS: Il lève les yeux vers un avion.
  EN TP: a clock on a tower
  fr TP: une horloge sur une tour
  EN FP: a clock on a wall
  fr FP: une horloge sur un mur
4608 | crowd (noun): a large group of people packed together | loc: foule
  EN TS: The whole crowd is vibing!
  fr TS: Toute la foule est à fond !
  EN FS: The whole crowd is sleeping!
  fr FS: Toute la foule dort !
  EN TP: a huge dancing crowd
  fr TP: une énorme foule qui danse
  EN FP: a football crowd
  fr FP: une foule de supporters de foot
4610 | dad (noun): an informal word for father | loc: le papa
  EN TS: Dad is ready to catch her!
  fr TS: Papa est prêt à la rattraper !
  EN FS: Mom is ready to catch her!
  fr FS: Maman est prête à la rattraper !
  EN TP: jumping into dad's arms
  fr TP: sauter dans les bras de papa
  EN FP: running away from dad
  fr FP: s'enfuir loin de papa
4611 | daughter (noun): a female child | loc: fille
  EN TS: Her daughter drew the family.
  fr TS: Sa fille a dessiné la famille.
  EN FS: Her daughter drew a horse.
  fr FS: Sa fille a dessiné un cheval.
  EN TP: a daughter baking with mom
  fr TP: une fille en cuisine avec maman
  EN FP: a daughter shopping with mom
  fr FP: une fille en shopping avec maman
4612 | sell (verb): to give something in exchange for money | loc: vendre
  EN TS: He sells the best peaches.
  fr TS: Il vend les meilleures pêches.
  EN FS: He sells the best apples.
  fr FS: Il vend les meilleures pommes.
  EN TP: selling peaches at a market
  fr TP: vendre des pêches au marché
  EN FP: selling apples at a market
  fr FP: vendre des pommes au marché
4613 | earth (noun): the loose soft material of the land surface | loc: la terre
  EN TS: He is turning the dark earth.
  fr TS: Il retourne la terre sombre.
  EN FS: He is turning the white sand.
  fr FS: Il retourne le sable blanc.
  EN TP: turning the dark earth
  fr TP: retourner la terre sombre
  EN FP: digging in the sand
  fr FP: creuser dans le sable
4614 | hang (verb): to attach something high up so it drops down | loc: pendre
  EN TS: He is hanging a paper garland.
  fr TS: Il pend une guirlande en papier.
  EN FS: He is hanging a paper lantern.
  fr FS: Il pend une lanterne en papier.
  EN TP: hanging party decorations
  fr TP: pendre des décorations de fête
  EN FP: hanging the washing
  fr FP: pendre le linge
4615 | colorful (adjective): having striking, bright color | loc: coloré
  EN TS: This room is super colorful.
  fr TS: Cette pièce est super colorée.
  EN FS: This room is super grey.
  fr FS: Cette pièce est super grise.
  EN TP: colorful party balloons
  fr TP: des ballons de fête colorés
  EN FP: colorful Easter eggs
  fr FP: des œufs de Pâques colorés
4616 | wood (noun): a large area densely covered with trees | loc: bois
  EN TS: A wild stag in a misty wood.
  fr TS: Un cerf sauvage dans un bois brumeux.
  EN FS: A wild boar in a misty wood.
  fr FS: Un sanglier dans un bois brumeux.
  EN TP: a stag in the wood
  fr TP: un cerf dans le bois
  EN FP: a table made of wood
  fr FP: une table en bois
4618 | charge (noun): a sudden rush toward someone or something | loc: charge
  EN TS: Here comes the charge!
  fr TS: Voici la charge !
  EN FS: Here comes the rain!
  fr FS: Voici la pluie !
  EN TP: a charge with shields
  fr TP: une charge avec des boucliers
  EN FP: a charge for extra bags
  fr FP: les charges de l'appartement
4619 | raw (adjective): not processed or cooked, in a simple natural state | loc: cru
  EN TS: Raw chicken, raw fish, no dinner yet.
  fr TS: Poulet cru, poisson cru, toujours pas de dîner.
  EN FS: Raw chicken, raw beef, no dinner yet.
  fr FS: Poulet cru, bœuf cru, toujours pas de dîner.
  EN TP: a raw frozen chicken
  fr TP: un poulet cru congelé
  EN FP: a raw egg
  fr FP: un œuf cru
4620 | overnight (adverb): during or for one night | loc: pendant la nuit
  EN TS: He is sleeping here overnight.
  fr TS: Il dort ici pendant la nuit.
  EN FS: He is working here overnight.
  fr FS: Il travaille ici pendant la nuit.
  EN TP: stuck overnight at an airport
  fr TP: bloqué pendant la nuit à l'aéroport
  EN FP: an overnight train journey
  fr FP: un voyage en train de nuit
4621 | passenger (noun): a traveler riding in a vehicle, not driving it | loc: passager
  EN TS: The passengers look like the flight is never coming.
  fr TS: Les passagers ont l'air de croire que le vol n'arrivera jamais.
  EN FS: The pilots look like the flight is never coming.
  fr FS: Les pilotes ont l'air de croire que le vol n'arrivera jamais.
  EN TP: tired passengers waiting
  fr TP: des passagers fatigués qui attendent
  EN FP: passengers on a plane
  fr FP: des passagers dans un avion
4622 | sigh (verb): to breathe out deeply and heavily | loc: soupirer
  EN TS: She is sighing at the ceiling.
  fr TS: Elle soupire en fixant le plafond.
  EN FS: She is sighing at the window.
  fr FS: Elle soupire en fixant la fenêtre.
  EN TP: sighing at the gate
  fr TP: soupirer à la porte d'embarquement
  EN FP: sighing with relief
  fr FP: soupirer de soulagement
4623 | vote (noun): a choice made by counting people in favor | loc: vote
  EN TS: The votes are falling out.
  fr TS: Les votes tombent en vrac.
  EN FS: The coins are falling out.
  fr FS: Les pièces tombent en vrac.
  EN TP: counting the votes
  fr TP: compter les votes
  EN FP: casting a vote
  fr FP: déposer son vote
4624 | majority (noun): more than half of the votes | loc: majorité
  EN TS: A clear majority!
  fr TS: Une nette majorité !
  EN FS: A clear minority!
  fr FS: Une nette minorité !
  EN TP: a clear majority
  fr TP: une nette majorité
  EN FP: a majority of empty chairs
  fr FP: une majorité de chaises vides
4625 | vote (verb): to express your choice for a candidate | loc: voter
  EN TS: She is voting like a champion!
  fr TS: Elle vote comme une championne !
  EN FS: He is voting like a champion!
  fr FS: Il vote comme un champion !
  EN TP: voting with joy
  fr TP: voter avec joie
  EN FP: voting by post
  fr FP: voter par courrier
4627 | leave (verb): to go away from a place | loc: partir
  EN TS: Everyone leaves. He waves!
  fr TS: Tout le monde part. Lui, il fait coucou !
  EN FS: Everyone stays. He waves!
  fr FS: Tout le monde reste. Lui, il fait coucou !
  EN TP: waving as the ship leaves
  fr TP: faire coucou quand le bateau part
  EN FP: leaving on a bike
  fr FP: partir à vélo
4628 | sad (adjective): feeling or showing unhappiness | loc: triste
  EN TS: Picnic cancelled. He is sad.
  fr TS: Pique-nique annulé. Il est triste.
  EN FS: Picnic cancelled. She is sad.
  fr FS: Pique-nique annulé. Elle est triste.
  EN TP: sad about the rain
  fr TP: triste à cause de la pluie
  EN FP: sad about the snow
  fr FP: triste à cause de la neige
4629 | endless (adjective): seeming to have no end, tiresomely long | loc: interminable
  EN TS: Endless sand, one tiny walker.
  fr TS: Du sable interminable, un minuscule marcheur.
  EN FS: Endless sand, one tiny camel.
  fr FS: Du sable interminable, un minuscule chameau.
  EN TP: endless rows of dunes
  fr TP: des rangées de dunes interminables
  EN FP: an endless queue of cars
  fr FP: une file de voitures interminable
4631 | design (verb): to make or work out a plan for something | loc: concevoir | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He designed a birdhouse.
  fr TS: Il a conçu un nichoir.
  EN FS: He designed a dog house.
  fr FS: Il a conçu une niche.
  EN TP: designing a birdhouse
  fr TP: concevoir un nichoir
  EN FP: designing a website
  fr FP: concevoir un site web
4632 | workspace (noun): the desk area where you set up to work | loc: l'espace de travail
  EN TS: The workspace is now complete.
  fr TS: L'espace de travail est enfin prêt.
  EN FS: The kitchen is now complete.
  fr FS: La cuisine est enfin prête.
  EN TP: setting up a workspace
  fr TP: installer un espace de travail
  EN FP: sharing a workspace
  fr FP: partager un espace de travail
4633 | desperate (adjective): marked by despair or loss of hope | loc: désespéré
  EN TS: The old car made him desperate.
  fr TS: La vieille voiture l'a rendu désespéré.
  EN FS: The old van made him desperate.
  fr FS: La vieille camionnette l'a rendu désespéré.
  EN TP: desperate in the rain
  fr TP: désespéré sous la pluie
  EN FP: desperate for a coffee
  fr FP: désespéré sans son café
4635 | destination (noun): the place you are travelling to | loc: destination
  EN TS: She reached her destination.
  fr TS: Elle est arrivée à destination.
  EN FS: She reached her hotel.
  fr FS: Elle est arrivée à son hôtel.
  EN TP: reaching her destination
  fr TP: arriver à destination
  EN FP: a destination by plane
  fr FP: une destination en avion
4636 | lighthouse (noun): a tall sea tower whose light guides ships | loc: phare
  EN TS: She found the real lighthouse!
  fr TS: Elle a trouvé le vrai phare !
  EN FS: She found the real castle!
  fr FS: Elle a trouvé le vrai château !
  EN TP: a red-and-white lighthouse
  fr TP: un phare rouge et blanc
  EN FP: a lighthouse in a storm
  fr FP: un phare dans la tempête
4637 | destroy (verb): to cause the destruction of something | loc: détruire
  EN TS: They are destroying the house, and she films it.
  fr TS: Ils détruisent la maison, et elle filme tout.
  EN FS: They are destroying the car, and she films it.
  fr FS: Ils détruisent la voiture, et elle filme tout.
  EN TP: destroying an old house
  fr TP: détruire une vieille maison
  EN FP: destroying an old car
  fr FP: détruire une vieille voiture
4638 | rubble (noun): broken stones left when a building falls | loc: décombres
  EN TS: Bye, house. Now it is rubble.
  fr TS: Adieu, la maison. Il ne reste que des décombres.
  EN FS: Bye, barn. Now it is rubble.
  fr FS: Adieu, la grange. Il ne reste que des décombres.
  EN TP: a heap of rubble
  fr TP: un tas de décombres
  EN FP: clearing away the rubble
  fr FP: déblayer les décombres
4640 | detergent (noun): a liquid or powder used for washing up | loc: détergent
  EN TS: Blue detergent, white shirt!
  fr TS: Détergent bleu, chemise blanche !
  EN FS: Pink detergent, white shirt!
  fr FS: Détergent rose, chemise blanche !
  EN TP: pouring laundry detergent
  fr TP: verser du détergent à linge
  EN FP: detergent for the dishes
  fr FP: du détergent pour la vaisselle
4641 | diet (noun): a chosen selection of foods to eat | loc: le régime
  EN TS: Goodbye, doughnuts. Hello, diet.
  fr TS: Adieu les donuts. Bonjour le régime.
  EN FS: Goodbye, salad. Hello, doughnuts.
  fr FS: Adieu la salade. Bonjour les donuts.
  EN TP: meal prep for a diet
  fr TP: des repas préparés pour un régime
  EN FP: a diet of doughnuts
  fr FP: un régime à base de donuts
4642 | pit (noun): a sizeable hole in the ground | loc: fosse
  EN TS: Best pit ever. The dog helped.
  fr TS: Meilleure fosse du monde. Le chien a aidé.
  EN FS: Best pit ever. The cat helped.
  fr FS: Meilleure fosse du monde. Le chat a aidé.
  EN TP: a deep sand pit
  fr TP: une fosse profonde dans le sable
  EN FP: a pit full of snakes
  fr FP: une fosse pleine de serpents
4644 | excuse (noun): a defense of some bad behavior or failure | loc: l'excuse | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Work? What a bad excuse.
  fr TS: Le boulot ? Quelle excuse bidon.
  EN FS: Rain? What a bad excuse.
  fr FS: La pluie ? Quelle excuse bidon.
  EN TP: a bad excuse for leaving
  fr TP: une excuse bidon pour partir
  EN FP: an excuse for being late
  fr FP: une excuse pour être en retard
4645 | attach (verb): to fasten something so it is attached | loc: attacher
  EN TS: Hands are attaching balls.
  fr TS: Des mains attachent des boules.
  EN FS: Hands are attaching wheels.
  fr FS: Des mains attachent des roues.
  EN TP: attaching balls to rods
  fr TP: attacher des boules à des tiges
  EN FP: attaching rods to the wall
  fr FP: attacher des tiges au mur
4646 | divorce (noun): the legal ending of a marriage | loc: divorce
  EN TS: Rings off: this is a divorce.
  fr TS: Alliances retirées : c'est un divorce.
  EN FS: Rings off: this is a wedding.
  fr FS: Alliances retirées : c'est un mariage.
  EN TP: rings left after a divorce
  fr TP: des alliances laissées après un divorce
  EN FP: a divorce lawyer's office
  fr FP: un avocat spécialisé en divorce
4648 | examine (verb): to check someone's body for signs of illness | loc: examiner
  EN TS: She is examining a small boy.
  fr TS: Elle examine un petit garçon.
  EN FS: She is examining a small dog.
  fr FS: Elle examine un petit chien.
  EN TP: examining a worried boy
  fr TP: examiner un garçon inquiet
  EN FP: examining a worried cat
  fr FP: examiner un chat inquiet
4649 | teddy (noun): a child's toy bear, plush and stuffed | loc: ours en peluche
  EN TS: The teddy is braver than him.
  fr TS: L'ours en peluche est plus courageux que lui.
  EN FS: The puppy is braver than him.
  fr FS: Le chiot est plus courageux que lui.
  EN TP: hugging a brown teddy
  fr TP: câliner un ours en peluche marron
  EN FP: hugging a brown puppy
  fr FP: câliner un chiot marron
4650 | reaction (noun): a process in which substances change into others | loc: réaction
  EN TS: The reaction is making foam!
  fr TS: La réaction fait de la mousse !
  EN FS: The reaction is making smoke!
  fr FS: La réaction fait de la fumée !
  EN TP: a foaming chemical reaction
  fr TP: une réaction chimique qui mousse
  EN FP: a quick allergic reaction
  fr FP: une réaction allergique rapide
4651 | marine (adjective): relating to the sea | loc: marin
  EN TS: Marine life at sunset.
  fr TS: La vie marine au coucher du soleil.
  EN FS: Marine life at noon.
  fr FS: La vie marine à midi.
  EN TP: marine animals jumping
  fr TP: des animaux marins qui sautent
  EN FP: a marine in uniform
  fr FP: un marin en uniforme
4652 | compete (verb): to take part in a contest against others | loc: concourir
  EN TS: She is competing with a man.
  fr TS: Elle concourt contre un homme.
  EN FS: She is competing with a child.
  fr FS: Elle concourt contre un enfant.
  EN TP: competing at arm-wrestling
  fr TP: concourir au bras de fer
  EN FP: competing in a cooking show
  fr FP: concourir dans une émission de cuisine
4654 | doubt (noun): the state of being unsure | loc: doute
  EN TS: She has doubts about it.
  fr TS: Elle a des doutes là-dessus.
  EN FS: She has no doubts about it.
  fr FS: Elle n'a aucun doute là-dessus.
  EN TP: doubts about a shelf
  fr TP: des doutes sur une étagère
  EN FP: doubts about the paint
  fr FP: des doutes sur la peinture
4655 | dress (verb): to put on clothes | loc: s'habiller
  EN TS: He is dressing in a suit.
  fr TS: Il s'habille en costume.
  EN FS: He is dressing in a hoodie.
  fr FS: Il s'habille en sweat à capuche.
  EN TP: dressing in a suit
  fr TP: s'habiller en costume
  EN FP: dressing a salad
  fr FP: assaisonner une salade
4656 | mount (verb): to attach something to a support | loc: fixer
  EN TS: She mounted two shelves.
  fr TS: Elle a fixé deux étagères.
  EN FS: She mounted two mirrors.
  fr FS: Elle a fixé deux miroirs.
  EN TP: mounting shelves on a wall
  fr TP: fixer des étagères au mur
  EN FP: mounting a horse
  fr FP: monter à cheval
4657 | to drink (verb): to take in liquids | loc: boire
  EN TS: She is drinking coconut water.
  fr TS: Elle boit de l'eau de coco.
  EN FS: She is drinking orange juice.
  fr FS: Elle boit du jus d'orange.
  EN TP: to drink through a straw
  fr TP: boire avec une paille
  EN FP: to drink from a tap
  fr FP: boire au robinet
4658 | drive (verb): to operate or control a vehicle | loc: conduire
  EN TS: She is driving by the sea.
  fr TS: Elle conduit au bord de la mer.
  EN FS: She is driving by a lake.
  fr FS: Elle conduit au bord d'un lac.
  EN TP: to drive along the coast
  fr TP: conduire le long de la côte
  EN FP: to drive along a river
  fr FP: conduire le long d'une rivière
4659 | car (noun): a motor vehicle with four wheels | loc: voiture
  EN TS: All these people are in cars.
  fr TS: Tous ces gens sont en voiture.
  EN FS: All these people are on bikes.
  fr FS: Tous ces gens sont à vélo.
  EN TP: people in their cars
  fr TP: des gens dans leurs voitures
  EN FP: people in their beds
  fr FP: des gens dans leurs lits
4660 | pile (noun): a heap of things placed on top of each other | loc: pile
  EN TS: Her shopping is one big pile.
  fr TS: Ses courses forment une grosse pile.
  EN FS: Her shopping is in one bag.
  fr FS: Ses courses tiennent dans un seul sac.
  EN TP: a pile of boxes
  fr TP: une pile de cartons
  EN FP: a pile of laundry
  fr FP: une pile de linge
4661 | fall (noun): the season when leaves fall from the trees | loc: automne
  EN TS: Fall is here in the park!
  fr TS: L'automne est arrivé au parc !
  EN FS: Spring is here in the park!
  fr FS: Le printemps est arrivé au parc !
  EN TP: yellow leaves in the fall
  fr TP: des feuilles jaunes en automne
  EN FP: fall fashion in a shop
  fr FP: la mode d'automne en boutique
4662 | supply (verb): to give something useful or necessary | loc: approvisionner
  EN TS: A plane is supplying the village.
  fr TS: Un avion approvisionne le village.
  EN FS: A truck is supplying the village.
  fr FS: Un camion approvisionne le village.
  EN TP: supplying a village by air
  fr TP: approvisionner un village par avion
  EN FP: supplying a village by boat
  fr FP: approvisionner un village par bateau
4663 | drop (noun): a small round shape, like a bead of liquid | loc: goutte
  EN TS: A drop is about to land.
  fr TS: Une goutte est sur le point de tomber.
  EN FS: A bee is about to land.
  fr FS: Une abeille est sur le point de se poser.
  EN TP: a single clear drop
  fr TP: une seule goutte limpide
  EN FP: a drop of rain
  fr FP: une goutte de pluie
4665 | accident (noun): an unfortunate mishap causing damage or injury | loc: accident
  EN TS: One accident after another!
  fr TS: Un accident après l'autre !
  EN FS: One goal after another!
  fr FS: Un but après l'autre !
  EN TP: a run of small accidents
  fr TP: une série de petits accidents
  EN FP: a car accident
  fr FP: un accident de voiture
4666 | smash (verb): to hit something hard | loc: fracasser
  EN TS: The pumpkin smashed. Oops!
  fr TS: La citrouille s'est fracassée. Oups !
  EN FS: The egg smashed. Oops!
  fr FS: L'œuf s'est fracassé. Oups !
  EN TP: a pumpkin smashing on concrete
  fr TP: une citrouille fracassée sur le béton
  EN FP: a pumpkin smashing a window
  fr FP: une citrouille qui fracasse une vitre
4667 | plane (noun): an aircraft with fixed wings and engines | loc: avion
  EN TS: The plane is dropping boxes. Air delivery!
  fr TS: L'avion largue des cartons. Livraison par les airs !
  EN FS: The plane is dropping letters. Air delivery!
  fr FS: L'avion largue des lettres. Livraison par les airs !
  EN TP: a plane dropping crates
  fr TP: un avion qui largue des caisses
  EN FP: a plane landing on grass
  fr FP: un avion qui atterrit sur l'herbe
4668 | to smell (verb): to inhale the odor of something | loc: sentir
  EN TS: She is smelling the washing.
  fr TS: Elle sent le linge.
  EN FS: She is ironing the washing.
  fr FS: Elle repasse le linge.
  EN TP: smelling clean washing
  fr TP: sentir du linge propre
  EN FP: smelling the sea air
  fr FP: sentir l'air marin
4669 | laundry (noun): garments that can be cleaned by washing | loc: linge
  EN TS: Laundry with a sea view!
  fr TS: Du linge avec vue sur la mer !
  EN FS: Laundry with a city view!
  fr FS: Du linge avec vue sur la ville !
  EN TP: white laundry on a line
  fr TP: du linge blanc sur un fil
  EN FP: a bag of dirty laundry
  fr FP: un sac de linge sale
4670 | roof (noun): the protective covering on top of a building | loc: toit
  EN TS: She is on the roof.
  fr TS: Elle est sur le toit.
  EN FS: She is in the garden.
  fr FS: Elle est dans le jardin.
  EN TP: washing on a flat roof
  fr TP: du linge sur un toit plat
  EN FP: a cat on a roof
  fr FP: un chat sur un toit
4671 | machine (noun): a thing with moving metal parts built to work | loc: machine
  EN TS: The blanket is in the machine.
  fr TS: La couverture est dans la machine.
  EN FS: The towel is in the machine.
  fr FS: La serviette est dans la machine.
  EN TP: a washing machine
  fr TP: une machine à laver
  EN FP: a coffee machine
  fr FP: une machine à café
4673 | weak (adjective): lacking physical strength | loc: faible
  EN TS: He is way too weak for it!
  fr TS: Il est bien trop faible pour ça !
  EN FS: He is way too strong for it!
  fr FS: Il est bien trop fort pour ça !
  EN TP: a weak skinny arm
  fr TP: un bras maigre et faible
  EN FP: a weak cup of tea
  fr FP: un thé trop faible
4674 | shelf (noun): a flat horizontal surface for holding objects | loc: étagère
  EN TS: He is dusting the shelves.
  fr TS: Il dépoussière les étagères.
  EN FS: He is painting the shelves.
  fr FS: Il peint les étagères.
  EN TP: dusting the shelves
  fr TP: dépoussiérer les étagères
  EN FP: building the shelves
  fr FP: monter les étagères
4675 | careful (adjective): showing caution, care or attention | loc: prudent
  EN TS: He is not careful at all!
  fr TS: Il n'est pas prudent du tout !
  EN FS: She is not careful at all!
  fr FS: Elle n'est pas prudente du tout !
  EN TP: not careful on a bridge
  fr TP: pas prudent sur un pont
  EN FP: careful with the tulips
  fr FP: prudent avec les tulipes
4676 | tradition (noun): a pattern of action passed down over time | loc: tradition
  EN TS: Carrying cheese is a tradition here.
  fr TS: Porter du fromage, c'est une tradition ici.
  EN FS: Carrying fish is a tradition here.
  fr FS: Porter du poisson, c'est une tradition ici.
  EN TP: an old cheese tradition
  fr TP: une vieille tradition fromagère
  EN FP: an old dance tradition
  fr FP: une vieille tradition de danse
4678 | eat (verb): to take in solid food | loc: manger
  EN TS: Everyone is eating something.
  fr TS: Tout le monde mange quelque chose.
  EN FS: Everyone is drinking tea.
  fr FS: Tout le monde boit du thé.
  EN TP: eating a triple burger
  fr TP: manger un triple burger
  EN FP: eating a salad bowl
  fr FP: manger un bol de salade
4679 | delicious (adjective): greatly pleasing to taste | loc: délicieux
  EN TS: These tacos are delicious!
  fr TS: Ces tacos sont délicieux !
  EN FS: These burgers are delicious!
  fr FS: Ces burgers sont délicieux !
  EN TP: two delicious tacos
  fr TP: deux tacos délicieux
  EN FP: a delicious cold soup
  fr FP: une délicieuse soupe froide
4680 | rider (noun): a traveler who rides an animal like a horse | loc: cavalier
  EN TS: A rider is mounting a camel.
  fr TS: Un cavalier monte sur un chameau.
  EN FS: A rider is mounting a horse.
  fr FS: Un cavalier monte sur un cheval.
  EN TP: a rider mounting a camel
  fr TP: un cavalier qui monte un chameau
  EN FP: a rider on a horse
  fr FP: un cavalier à cheval
4681 | lamp (noun): an artificial source of light | loc: lampe
  EN TS: So many glass lamps!
  fr TS: Tant de lampes en verre !
  EN FS: So many glass bottles!
  fr FS: Tant de bouteilles en verre !
  EN TP: a blue glass lamp
  fr TP: une lampe en verre bleu
  EN FP: a blue glass vase
  fr FP: un vase en verre bleu
4682 | trader (noun): someone who buys goods to sell them | loc: marchand
  EN TS: The trader is pouring spice.
  fr TS: Le marchand verse des épices.
  EN FS: The trader is pouring tea.
  fr FS: Le marchand verse du thé.
  EN TP: a spice trader
  fr TP: un marchand d'épices
  EN FP: a stock market trader
  fr FP: un trader en bourse
4683 | rice (noun): grains used as food | loc: riz
  EN TS: Rice is all over the counter.
  fr TS: Il y a du riz partout sur le plan de travail.
  EN FS: Salt is all over the counter.
  fr FS: Il y a du sel partout sur le plan de travail.
  EN TP: a bowl of cooked rice
  fr TP: un bol de riz cuit
  EN FP: a bag of raw rice
  fr FP: un sac de riz cru
4684 | elbow (noun): the joint between the forearm and upper arm | loc: coude
  EN TS: Elbow bump: new handshake.
  fr TS: Check du coude : la nouvelle poignée de main.
  EN FS: Fist bump: new handshake.
  fr FS: Check du poing : la nouvelle poignée de main.
  EN TP: bumping elbows at work
  fr TP: se checker du coude au bureau
  EN FP: elbows on the desk
  fr FP: les coudes sur le bureau
4685 | repair (verb): to fix something by replacing a broken part | loc: réparer
  EN TS: He is repairing the fuse box.
  fr TS: Il répare le tableau électrique.
  EN FS: He is repairing the car.
  fr FS: Il répare la voiture.
  EN TP: repairing the fuse box
  fr TP: réparer le tableau électrique
  EN FP: repairing a flat tyre
  fr FP: réparer un pneu crevé
4686 | repair (noun): the act of making something work again | loc: réparation
  EN TS: Repair done, lights on!
  fr TS: Réparation faite, la lumière revient !
  EN FS: Repair done, water on!
  fr FS: Réparation faite, l'eau revient !
  EN TP: a repair in the dark
  fr TP: une réparation dans le noir
  EN FP: a car repair shop
  fr FP: un garage de réparation auto
4687 | embassy (noun): a building where ambassadors live or work | loc: ambassade
  EN TS: She is at the embassy.
  fr TS: Elle est à l'ambassade.
  EN FS: She is inside the embassy.
  fr FS: Elle est dans l'ambassade.
  EN TP: papers for the embassy
  fr TP: des papiers pour l'ambassade
  EN FP: an embassy party at night
  fr FP: une soirée à l'ambassade
4688 | massive (adjective): imposing in size or bulk | loc: massif
  EN TS: Just a massive whale, no big deal.
  fr TS: Juste une baleine massive, rien de spécial.
  EN FS: Just a massive shark, no big deal.
  fr FS: Juste un requin massif, rien de spécial.
  EN TP: a massive humpback whale
  fr TP: une baleine à bosse massive
  EN FP: a massive storm at sea
  fr FP: une tempête massive en mer
4689 | boat (noun): a small vessel for travel on water | loc: bateau
  EN TS: A whale next to the boat!
  fr TS: Une baleine à côté du bateau !
  EN FS: A shark next to the boat!
  fr FS: Un requin à côté du bateau !
  EN TP: a whale by the boat
  fr TP: une baleine près du bateau
  EN FP: a dolphin by the boat
  fr FP: un dauphin près du bateau
4691 | colleague (noun): a person you work with at your job | loc: collègue
  EN TS: He is greeting a colleague.
  fr TS: Il salue un collègue.
  EN FS: He is greeting a dog.
  fr FS: Il salue un chien.
  EN TP: greeting a colleague
  fr TP: saluer un collègue
  EN FP: a colleague on holiday
  fr FP: un collègue en vacances
4692 | product (noun): goods offered for sale | loc: produit
  EN TS: He is shelving the products.
  fr TS: Il met les produits en rayon.
  EN FS: He is shelving the books.
  fr FS: Il met les livres en rayon.
  EN TP: products on a shelf
  fr TP: des produits sur une étagère
  EN FP: products in a truck
  fr FP: des produits dans un camion
4693 | hire (verb): to engage someone for work | loc: embaucher
  EN TS: The boss just hired him.
  fr TS: Le patron vient de l'embaucher.
  EN FS: The boss just fired him.
  fr FS: Le patron vient de le virer.
  EN TP: hiring a new worker
  fr TP: embaucher un nouvel employé
  EN FP: hiring a holiday car
  fr FP: louer une voiture de vacances
4694 | contract (noun): a binding agreement enforceable by law | loc: contrat
  EN TS: He signed the contract!
  fr TS: Il a signé le contrat !
  EN FS: He tore up the contract!
  fr FS: Il a déchiré le contrat !
  EN TP: signing a contract
  fr TP: signer un contrat
  EN FP: reading a contract at home
  fr FP: lire un contrat chez soi
4695 | chaos (noun): a state of extreme confusion and disorder | loc: chaos
  EN TS: He made all this chaos.
  fr TS: C'est lui qui a mis tout ce chaos.
  EN FS: He cleaned up all this chaos.
  fr FS: C'est lui qui a rangé tout ce chaos.
  EN TP: chaos on the floor
  fr TP: le chaos par terre
  EN FP: chaos in the kitchen
  fr FP: le chaos dans la cuisine
4696 | encourage (verb): to inspire someone with confidence | loc: encourager
  EN TS: They are encouraging her!
  fr TS: Ils l'encouragent !
  EN FS: They are laughing at her!
  fr FS: Ils se moquent d'elle !
  EN TP: encouraging a climber
  fr TP: encourager une grimpeuse
  EN FP: encouraging a child to read
  fr FP: encourager un enfant à lire
4697 | start (noun): the beginning of anything | loc: début
  EN TS: He has a lightning start!
  fr TS: Il a un début fulgurant !
  EN FS: He has a slow start!
  fr FS: Il a un début lent !
  EN TP: a start from the blocks
  fr TP: un début de course en starting-blocks
  EN FP: the start of school
  fr FP: le début des cours
4698 | motor (noun): a machine that turns energy into motion | loc: moteur
  EN TS: What a huge motor!
  fr TS: Quel moteur énorme !
  EN FS: What a huge tyre!
  fr FS: Quel pneu énorme !
  EN TP: a huge V8 motor
  fr TP: un énorme moteur V8
  EN FP: a huge boat motor
  fr FP: un énorme moteur de bateau
4699 | machinery (noun): machines as a group | loc: machinerie
  EN TS: He's inspecting the machinery.
  fr TS: Il inspecte la machinerie.
  EN FS: He is repairing the machinery.
  fr FS: Il répare la machinerie.
  EN TP: old factory machinery
  fr TP: une vieille machinerie d'usine
  EN FP: old farm machinery
  fr FP: une vieille machinerie agricole
4700 | robot (noun): a mechanism that can move automatically | loc: robot
  EN TS: The robot handed him a mug.
  fr TS: Le robot lui a tendu une tasse.
  EN FS: The robot handed him a phone.
  fr FS: Le robot lui a tendu un téléphone.
  EN TP: a robot holding a mug
  fr TP: un robot qui tient une tasse
  EN FP: a robot vacuum cleaner
  fr FP: un robot aspirateur
4701 | ruin (verb): to destroy completely | loc: détruire
  EN TS: The sea ruined it. Thanks, sea.
  fr TS: La mer l'a détruit. Merci, la mer.
  EN FS: The dog ruined it. Thanks, dog.
  fr FS: Le chien l'a détruit. Merci, le chien.
  EN TP: a ruined sandcastle
  fr TP: un château de sable détruit
  EN FP: a ruined old church
  fr FP: une vieille église détruite
4702 | escape (verb): to get away from danger | loc: s'échapper | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The goat escaped. Bye, farmer!
  fr TS: La chèvre s'est échappée. Salut, le fermier !
  EN FS: The cow escaped. Bye, farmer!
  fr FS: La vache s'est échappée. Salut, le fermier !
  EN TP: escaping from a goat pen
  fr TP: s'échapper d'un enclos à chèvres
  EN FP: escaping from a fox
  fr FP: fuir un renard
4703 | raise (verb): to move something from lower to higher | loc: lever | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is raising a green flag.
  fr TS: Il lève un drapeau vert.
  EN FS: He is raising a red flag.
  fr FS: Il lève un drapeau rouge.
  EN TP: raising a flag
  fr TP: lever un drapeau
  EN FP: raising a child
  fr FP: élever un enfant
4704 | hat (noun): headwear that protects the head from bad weather | loc: chapeau
  EN TS: He wears a fur hat in a sauna!
  fr TS: Il porte un chapeau en fourrure au sauna !
  EN FS: He wears a cap in a sauna!
  fr FS: Il porte une casquette au sauna !
  EN TP: wearing a fur hat
  fr TP: porter un chapeau en fourrure
  EN FP: wearing a straw hat
  fr FP: porter un chapeau de paille
4706 | to shout (verb): to speak in a loud voice | loc: crier
  EN TS: The whole stadium is shouting.
  fr TS: Tout le stade crie.
  EN FS: The whole stadium is sitting.
  fr FS: Tout le stade est assis.
  EN TP: fans shouting in a stadium
  fr TP: des supporters qui crient au stade
  EN FP: shouting in a library
  fr FP: crier dans une bibliothèque
4707 | patient (noun): a person who needs medical care | loc: patient
  EN TS: Best patient ever. He smiles.
  fr TS: Meilleur patient du monde. Il sourit.
  EN FS: Best patient ever. He sleeps.
  fr FS: Meilleur patient du monde. Il dort.
  EN TP: a patient with a nurse
  fr TP: un patient avec une infirmière
  EN FP: a patient in an ambulance
  fr FP: un patient dans une ambulance
4708 | guide (verb): to direct the course of someone's travel | loc: guider
  EN TS: A man is guiding the group.
  fr TS: Un homme guide le groupe.
  EN FS: A dog is guiding the group.
  fr FS: Un chien guide le groupe.
  EN TP: guiding a tour group
  fr TP: guider un groupe de touristes
  EN FP: guiding a ship into port
  fr FP: guider un navire au port
4709 | group (noun): a number of people or things taken as a unit | loc: groupe
  EN TS: The whole group is cheering!
  fr TS: Tout le groupe applaudit !
  EN FS: The whole group is crying!
  fr FS: Tout le groupe pleure !
  EN TP: a group in matching hats
  fr TP: un groupe aux chapeaux assortis
  EN FP: a group in matching shirts
  fr FP: un groupe aux t-shirts assortis
4711 | effort (noun): the hard work you put into something | loc: effort
  EN TS: His face is pure effort.
  fr TS: Son visage, c'est l'effort à l'état pur.
  EN FS: His face is pure boredom.
  fr FS: Son visage, c'est l'ennui à l'état pur.
  EN TP: rowing with full effort
  fr TP: ramer dans un effort total
  EN FP: running with full effort
  fr FP: courir dans un effort total
4712 | blow (verb): to push air out of your mouth to move something | loc: souffler
  EN TS: He is blowing out all the candles!
  fr TS: Il souffle toutes les bougies !
  EN FS: He is blowing up all the balloons!
  fr FS: Il gonfle tous les ballons !
  EN TP: blowing out birthday candles
  fr TP: souffler les bougies d'anniversaire
  EN FP: blowing up balloons
  fr FP: gonfler des ballons
4713 | goodbye (noun): a farewell remark | loc: adieu
  EN TS: They are waving goodbye.
  fr TS: Ils font des signes d'adieu.
  EN FS: They are waving hello.
  fr FS: Ils font des signes de bonjour.
  EN TP: waving goodbye from a quay
  fr TP: un signe d'adieu depuis le quai
  EN FP: a goodbye letter
  fr FP: une lettre d'adieu
4714 | expert (noun): a person with special knowledge or skill | loc: expert
  EN TS: The expert says it's genuine.
  fr TS: L'expert dit que c'est authentique.
  EN FS: The expert says it's fake.
  fr FS: L'expert dit que c'est un faux.
  EN TP: an expert with a vase
  fr TP: un expert avec un vase
  EN FP: an expert with a car
  fr FP: un expert avec une voiture
4715 | watermelon (noun): a very big green fruit, red and juicy inside | loc: pastèque
  EN TS: The watermelon exploded!
  fr TS: La pastèque a explosé !
  EN FS: The pumpkin exploded!
  fr FS: La citrouille a explosé !
  EN TP: a bursting watermelon
  fr TP: une pastèque qui éclate
  EN FP: a sliced watermelon
  fr FP: une pastèque en tranches
4716 | explore (verb): to travel through a new place to see it | loc: explorer
  EN TS: He is exploring the jungle like Indiana Jones.
  fr TS: Il explore la jungle comme Indiana Jones.
  EN FS: He is exploring the desert like Indiana Jones.
  fr FS: Il explore le désert comme Indiana Jones.
  EN TP: exploring a jungle cave
  fr TP: explorer une grotte dans la jungle
  EN FP: exploring a big city
  fr FP: explorer une grande ville
4717 | dark (adjective): without light or brightness | loc: sombre
  EN TS: It is so dark in the tunnel!
  fr TS: Il fait si sombre dans le tunnel !
  EN FS: It is so dark in the house!
  fr FS: Il fait si sombre dans la maison !
  EN TP: a dark rock tunnel
  fr TP: un tunnel rocheux sombre
  EN FP: a dark night sky
  fr FP: un ciel nocturne sombre
4718 | eye (noun): the organ of sight | loc: œil
  EN TS: Her brown eye fills the frame.
  fr TS: Son œil marron remplit l'image.
  EN FS: Her blue eye fills the frame.
  fr FS: Son œil bleu remplit l'image.
  EN TP: a torch in an eye
  fr TP: une lampe braquée sur un œil
  EN FP: an eye behind glasses
  fr FP: un œil derrière des lunettes
4719 | chin (noun): the part of the lower jaw that sticks out | loc: menton
  EN TS: The chin is round.
  fr TS: Le menton est rond.
  EN FS: The chin is pointed.
  fr FS: Le menton est pointu.
  EN TP: a rounded chin
  fr TP: un menton arrondi
  EN FP: a hand on the chin
  fr FP: une main sur le menton
4720 | funny (adjective): arousing laughter | loc: drôle
  EN TS: Funny faces and zero shame!
  fr TS: Des têtes drôles et zéro honte !
  EN FS: Funny hats and zero shame!
  fr FS: Des chapeaux drôles et zéro honte !
  EN TP: funny faces for the phone
  fr TP: des têtes drôles pour le téléphone
  EN FP: funny faces for the teacher
  fr FP: des têtes drôles pour le prof
4721 | fade (verb): to become less clearly visible | loc: s'estomper
  EN TS: Nooo, the rainbow is fading!
  fr TS: Nooon, l'arc-en-ciel s'estompe !
  EN FS: Nooo, the rainbow is growing!
  fr FS: Nooon, l'arc-en-ciel grandit !
  EN TP: a rainbow fading away
  fr TP: un arc-en-ciel qui s'estompe
  EN FP: a photo fading away
  fr FP: une photo qui s'estompe
4723 | fall (verb): to descend freely under gravity | loc: tomber
  EN TS: People are falling into foam.
  fr TS: Des gens tombent dans la mousse.
  EN FS: People are falling into water.
  fr FS: Des gens tombent dans l'eau.
  EN TP: falling into a foam pit
  fr TP: tomber dans une fosse à mousse
  EN FP: falling into a pool
  fr FP: tomber dans une piscine
4724 | to laugh (verb): to produce laughter | loc: rire
  EN TS: She can't stop laughing.
  fr TS: Elle n'arrête pas de rire.
  EN FS: She can't stop crying.
  fr FS: Elle n'arrête pas de pleurer.
  EN TP: laughing in a foam pit
  fr TP: rire dans une fosse à mousse
  EN FP: laughing in a ball pit
  fr FP: rire dans une piscine à balles
4725 | pizza (noun): Italian bread dough baked with sauce and cheese | loc: pizza
  EN TS: The whole family made pizza.
  fr TS: Toute la famille a fait des pizzas.
  EN FS: The whole family made pasta.
  fr FS: Toute la famille a fait des pâtes.
  EN TP: making pizza dough
  fr TP: faire de la pâte à pizza
  EN FP: ordering pizza online
  fr FP: commander une pizza en ligne
4728 | sleep (verb): to be asleep | loc: dormir | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is sleeping on the sofa. Long day!
  fr TS: Elle dort sur le canapé. Grosse journée !
  EN FS: She is sleeping on the floor. Long day!
  fr FS: Elle dort par terre. Grosse journée !
  EN TP: sleeping on the sofa
  fr TP: dormir sur le canapé
  EN FP: sleeping at work
  fr FP: dormir au boulot
4729 | afraid (adjective): filled with fear | loc: effrayé
  EN TS: The mask made them afraid!
  fr TS: Le masque les a effrayés !
  EN FS: The clown made them afraid!
  fr FS: Le clown les a effrayés !
  EN TP: afraid in a haunted house
  fr TP: effrayé dans une maison hantée
  EN FP: afraid of a spider
  fr FP: effrayé par une araignée
4730 | committee (noun): a special group chosen to consider a matter | loc: comité
  EN TS: The committee has nine people.
  fr TS: Le comité compte neuf personnes.
  EN FS: The committee has five people.
  fr FS: Le comité compte cinq personnes.
  EN TP: a committee around a table
  fr TP: un comité autour d'une table
  EN FP: a committee on a stage
  fr FP: un comité sur une scène
4731 | nation (noun): a large group who share a country and an identity | loc: nation
  EN TS: Each nation's flag is rising.
  fr TS: Le drapeau de chaque nation monte.
  EN FS: Each nation's flag is falling.
  fr FS: Le drapeau de chaque nation descend.
  EN TP: the flag of every nation
  fr TP: le drapeau de chaque nation
  EN FP: the army of a nation
  fr FP: l'armée d'une nation
4732 | build (verb): to make something by combining parts | loc: construire
  EN TS: He is building a wooden fence.
  fr TS: Il construit une clôture en bois.
  EN FS: He is building a wooden shed.
  fr FS: Il construit un abri en bois.
  EN TP: building a garden fence
  fr TP: construire une clôture de jardin
  EN FP: building a sandcastle
  fr FP: construire un château de sable
4733 | temperature (noun): the degree of hotness or coldness of something | loc: température
  EN TS: His temperature is sky high!
  fr TS: Sa température crève le plafond !
  EN FS: His temperature is very low!
  fr FS: Sa température est très basse !
  EN TP: taking his temperature
  fr TP: prendre sa température
  EN FP: the temperature outside
  fr FP: la température dehors
4734 | care (noun): the work of looking after someone | loc: soins
  EN TS: She is taking care of her.
  fr TS: Elle prend soin d'elle.
  EN FS: She is taking care of a dog.
  fr FS: Elle prend soin d'un chien.
  EN TP: loving care on the sofa
  fr TP: des soins tendres sur le canapé
  EN FP: skin care in the bathroom
  fr FP: des soins de la peau
4736 | army (noun): a large group of soldiers who fight together | loc: armée
  EN TS: The army is training on sand.
  fr TS: L'armée s'entraîne sur le sable.
  EN FS: The army is training in snow.
  fr FS: L'armée s'entraîne dans la neige.
  EN TP: an army training together
  fr TP: une armée qui s'entraîne
  EN FP: an army at war
  fr FP: une armée en guerre
4737 | jug (noun): a container with a handle for holding liquid | loc: cruche
  EN TS: She's pouring from a jug.
  fr TS: Elle verse le contenu d'une cruche.
  EN FS: She's pouring from a bottle.
  fr FS: Elle verse le contenu d'une bouteille.
  EN TP: pouring water from a jug
  fr TP: verser de l'eau d'une cruche
  EN FP: a jug of orange juice
  fr FP: une cruche de jus d'orange
4738 | everywhere (adverb): in all places, all around you | loc: partout
  EN TS: Her clothes are everywhere!
  fr TS: Ses vêtements sont partout !
  EN FS: Her books are everywhere!
  fr FS: Ses livres sont partout !
  EN TP: clothes everywhere
  fr TP: des vêtements partout
  EN FP: passports everywhere
  fr FP: des passeports partout
4739 | discover (verb): to discover that something is there | loc: découvrir
  EN TS: She discovered a huge diamond!
  fr TS: Elle a découvert un énorme diamant !
  EN FS: She discovered a huge ring!
  fr FS: Elle a découvert une énorme bague !
  EN TP: discovering a hidden diamond
  fr TP: découvrir un diamant caché
  EN FP: discovering a new country
  fr FP: découvrir un nouveau pays
4740 | wound (noun): a cut or open injury on the skin | loc: blessure
  EN TS: He will clean the wound now.
  fr TS: Il va nettoyer la blessure.
  EN FS: He will clean the bike now.
  fr FS: Il va nettoyer le vélo.
  EN TP: cleaning a bleeding wound
  fr TP: nettoyer une blessure qui saigne
  EN FP: a wound on the face
  fr FP: une blessure au visage
4741 | to pull (verb): to cause something to move by pulling | loc: tirer
  EN TS: He is pulling a fish out!
  fr TS: Il tire un poisson de l'eau !
  EN FS: He is pulling a boot out!
  fr FS: Il tire une botte de l'eau !
  EN TP: to pull up a fish
  fr TP: tirer un poisson hors de l'eau
  EN FP: to pull a boat ashore
  fr FP: tirer un bateau sur la rive
4742 | strong (adjective): having more power or strength than normal | loc: fort
  EN TS: She is strong on the ropes!
  fr TS: Elle est forte aux cordes !
  EN FS: She is strong on the bike!
  fr FS: Elle est forte sur le vélo !
  EN TP: strong arms and legs
  fr TP: des bras et des jambes forts
  EN FP: a strong cup of coffee
  fr FP: un café bien fort
4743 | flight (noun): a journey traveling by air in a plane | loc: vol
  EN TS: Juice! Best flight ever!
  fr TS: Du jus ! Meilleur vol de ma vie !
  EN FS: Pizza! Best flight ever!
  fr FS: De la pizza ! Meilleur vol de ma vie !
  EN TP: a flight at sunset
  fr TP: un vol au coucher du soleil
  EN FP: a flight of stairs
  fr FP: un vol de nuit
4744 | to relax (verb): to rest and let your body go calm | loc: se détendre
  EN TS: She is relaxing on the water.
  fr TS: Elle se détend sur l'eau.
  EN FS: She is relaxing on the sand.
  fr FS: Elle se détend sur le sable.
  EN TP: to relax on salty water
  fr TP: se détendre sur l'eau salée
  EN FP: relaxing in a hot bath
  fr FP: se détendre dans un bain chaud
4745 | flow (verb): to move along smoothly like water | loc: couler
  EN TS: The river flows past pebbles.
  fr TS: La rivière coule entre les galets.
  EN FS: The river flows past houses.
  fr FS: La rivière coule entre les maisons.
  EN TP: water flowing downstream
  fr TP: de l'eau qui coule vers l'aval
  EN FP: water flowing from a tap
  fr FP: de l'eau qui coule du robinet
4747 | seagull (noun): a big white and grey bird that lives by the sea | loc: mouette
  EN TS: The seagulls want his bread!
  fr TS: Les mouettes veulent son pain !
  EN FS: The seagulls want his hat!
  fr FS: Les mouettes veulent son chapeau !
  EN TP: seagulls around a ferry
  fr TP: des mouettes autour d'un ferry
  EN FP: seagulls on a beach
  fr FP: des mouettes sur une plage
4748 | cloud (noun): a white or grey mass of water drops up in the sky | loc: nuage
  EN TS: Only clouds below the wing.
  fr TS: Rien que des nuages sous l'aile.
  EN FS: Only mountains below the wing.
  fr FS: Rien que des montagnes sous l'aile.
  EN TP: clouds below a plane
  fr TP: des nuages sous un avion
  EN FP: clouds over the sea
  fr FP: des nuages au-dessus de la mer
4749 | formation (noun): a group of people arranged as one unit | loc: formation
  EN TS: They're falling in formation!
  fr TS: Ils tombent en formation !
  EN FS: They're swimming in formation!
  fr FS: Ils nagent en formation !
  EN TP: skydivers in a ring formation
  fr TP: des parachutistes en formation circulaire
  EN FP: a football team formation
  fr FP: la formation d'une équipe de foot
4750 | clothes (noun): the clothing you wear | loc: vêtements
  EN TS: She built a castle of clothes.
  fr TS: Elle a construit un château de vêtements.
  EN FS: She built a castle of books.
  fr FS: Elle a construit un château de livres.
  EN TP: folding clean clothes
  fr TP: plier des vêtements propres
  EN FP: washing dirty clothes
  fr FP: laver des vêtements sales
4751 | guide (noun): a person who shows tourists around a place | loc: guide
  EN TS: Guide with a yellow umbrella.
  fr TS: Guide avec un parapluie jaune.
  EN FS: Guide with a red umbrella.
  fr FS: Guide avec un parapluie rouge.
  EN TP: a guide with an umbrella
  fr TP: un guide avec un parapluie
  EN FP: a guide in a museum
  fr FP: un guide dans un musée
4752 | failure (noun): an act that fails | loc: échec
  EN TS: Failure! The oven did it.
  fr TS: Échec ! C'est le four qui a fait ça.
  EN FS: Success! The oven did it.
  fr FS: Succès ! C'est le four qui a fait ça.
  EN TP: a baking failure
  fr TP: un échec en pâtisserie
  EN FP: a failure in maths
  fr FP: un échec en maths
4753 | forgive (verb): to stop blaming someone and forgive them | loc: pardonner
  EN TS: Plot twist: he forgave him.
  fr TS: Coup de théâtre : il lui a pardonné.
  EN FS: Plot twist: he ignored him.
  fr FS: Coup de théâtre : il l'a ignoré.
  EN TP: forgiving an old friend
  fr TP: pardonner à un vieil ami
  EN FP: forgiving his little brother
  fr FP: pardonner à son petit frère
4754 | protest (verb): to say words that show you disagree | loc: protester
  EN TS: He is protesting: "Not me!"
  fr TS: Il proteste : « C'est pas moi ! »
  EN FS: She is protesting: "Not me!"
  fr FS: Elle proteste : « C'est pas moi ! »
  EN TP: protesting to the referee
  fr TP: protester auprès de l'arbitre
  EN FP: protesting in the street
  fr FP: protester dans la rue
4755 | fracture (noun): a break or crack in a bone | loc: fracture
  EN TS: The X-ray shows a hand fracture.
  fr TS: La radio montre une fracture de la main.
  EN FS: The X-ray shows a leg fracture.
  fr FS: La radio montre une fracture de la jambe.
  EN TP: a fracture on an X-ray
  fr TP: une fracture sur une radio
  EN FP: a fracture in a leg
  fr FP: une fracture à la jambe
4756 | france (noun): the European country whose capital is Paris | loc: France
  EN TS: A baguette on a bike? That is France!
  fr TS: Une baguette sur un vélo ? C'est ça, la France !
  EN FS: A pizza on a bike? That is France!
  fr FS: Une pizza sur un vélo ? C'est ça, la France !
  EN TP: cycling in France
  fr TP: faire du vélo en France
  EN FP: skiing in France
  fr FP: faire du ski en France
4757 | freedom (noun): the feeling of being free and held by nothing | loc: liberté
  EN TS: Summer freedom at last!
  fr TS: Enfin la liberté de l'été !
  EN FS: Winter freedom at last!
  fr FS: Enfin la liberté de l'hiver !
  EN TP: freedom on an open road
  fr TP: la liberté sur une route déserte
  EN FP: freedom in a big city
  fr FP: la liberté dans une grande ville
4758 | full (adjective): containing as much as is possible | loc: plein
  EN TS: Now the fridge is full, bro!
  fr TS: Maintenant le frigo est plein, frérot !
  EN FS: Now the fridge is empty, bro!
  fr FS: Maintenant le frigo est vide, frérot !
  EN TP: a fridge full of food
  fr TP: un frigo plein de nourriture
  EN FP: a full washing machine
  fr FP: une machine à laver pleine
4759 | baker (noun): someone who bakes bread and cakes as a job | loc: boulanger
  EN TS: The baker is talking into a baguette.
  fr TS: Le boulanger parle dans une baguette.
  EN FS: The baker is talking into a croissant.
  fr FS: Le boulanger parle dans un croissant.
  EN TP: a baker with a baguette
  fr TP: un boulanger avec une baguette
  EN FP: a baker making pizza
  fr FP: un boulanger qui fait une pizza
4760 | share (verb): to use one thing together with someone | loc: partager
  EN TS: They are sharing an ice cream.
  fr TS: Ils partagent une glace.
  EN FS: They are sharing a pizza.
  fr FS: Ils partagent une pizza.
  EN TP: to share an ice cream
  fr TP: partager une glace
  EN FP: to share a tram ticket
  fr FP: partager un ticket de tram
4762 | gallery (noun): a room where art is shown to the public | loc: galerie
  EN TS: He loves this gallery!
  fr TS: Il adore cette galerie !
  EN FS: He hates this gallery!
  fr FS: Il déteste cette galerie !
  EN TP: a big art gallery
  fr TP: une grande galerie d'art
  EN FP: a gallery full of cars
  fr FP: une galerie pleine de voitures
4763 | gamer (noun): a person who plays video games a lot | loc: gamer
  EN TS: These gamers are going crazy!
  fr TS: Ces gamers deviennent fous !
  EN FS: These gamers are all asleep!
  fr FS: Ces gamers dorment tous !
  EN TP: gamers in an arena
  fr TP: des gamers dans une arène
  EN FP: a gamer in a classroom
  fr FP: un gamer en classe
4764 | sofa (noun): a long soft seat for more than one person | loc: canapé
  EN TS: She is going wild on the sofa.
  fr TS: Elle se lâche sur le canapé.
  EN FS: She is going wild on the bed.
  fr FS: Elle se lâche sur le lit.
  EN TP: jumping on the sofa
  fr TP: sauter sur le canapé
  EN FP: sleeping on the sofa
  fr FP: dormir sur le canapé
4765 | greenhouse (noun): a building with glass walls and roof | loc: serre
  EN TS: The garden features a greenhouse.
  fr TS: Le jardin comprend une serre.
  EN FS: The garden features a swimming pool.
  fr FS: Le jardin comprend une piscine.
  EN TP: a small glass greenhouse
  fr TP: une petite serre en verre
  EN FP: a big plastic greenhouse
  fr FP: une grande serre en plastique
4766 | garden (verb): to work in the garden | loc: jardiner
  EN TS: She loves to garden.
  fr TS: Elle adore jardiner.
  EN FS: She loves to swim.
  fr FS: Elle adore nager.
  EN TP: to garden among flowers
  fr TP: jardiner parmi les fleurs
  EN FP: to garden in the rain
  fr FP: jardiner sous la pluie
4767 | gardener (noun): a person who looks after a garden | loc: jardinier
  EN TS: The gardener has big shears.
  fr TS: Le jardinier a une grande cisaille.
  EN FS: The gardener has a big axe.
  fr FS: Le jardinier a une grande hache.
  EN TP: a gardener with shears
  fr TP: un jardinier avec une cisaille
  EN FP: a gardener with a hose
  fr FP: un jardinier avec un tuyau
4768 | card (noun): a small piece of stiff paper used for games | loc: carte
  EN TS: He has the winning cards.
  fr TS: Il a les cartes gagnantes.
  EN FS: He has the winning dice.
  fr FS: Il a les dés gagnants.
  EN TP: two playing cards
  fr TP: deux cartes à jouer
  EN FP: a birthday card
  fr FP: une carte d'anniversaire
4769 | fence (noun): a barrier that goes around an area | loc: clôture
  EN TS: She is standing by a fence.
  fr TS: Elle se tient près d'une clôture.
  EN FS: She is sitting on a fence.
  fr FS: Elle est assise sur une clôture.
  EN TP: a fence along the rim
  fr TP: une clôture le long du bord
  EN FP: a fence around a garden
  fr FP: une clôture autour d'un jardin
4770 | boarding (noun): getting on a plane or ship as a passenger | loc: embarquement
  EN TS: Boarding is now in progress.
  fr TS: L'embarquement est en cours.
  EN FS: Landing is now in progress.
  fr FS: L'atterrissage est en cours.
  EN TP: boarding through a jet bridge
  fr TP: embarquement par passerelle
  EN FP: boarding at a train station
  fr FP: embarquement dans une gare
4771 | palace (noun): a large grand house where a king lives | loc: palais
  EN TS: Gate, gate, gate... palace!
  fr TS: Porte, porte, porte... palais !
  EN FS: Gate, gate, gate... church!
  fr FS: Porte, porte, porte... église !
  EN TP: a gate to a palace
  fr TP: une porte vers un palais
  EN FP: a palace in a city
  fr FP: un palais en ville
4772 | flock (noun): a group of birds together | loc: volée
  EN TS: A huge flock is in the sky.
  fr TS: Une énorme volée d'oiseaux est dans le ciel.
  EN FS: A huge flock is on the water.
  fr FS: Une énorme volée d'oiseaux est sur l'eau.
  EN TP: a flock of starlings
  fr TP: une volée d'étourneaux
  EN FP: a flock on a lake
  fr FP: une volée d'oiseaux sur un lac
4774 | generation (noun): all the people of about the same age alive now | loc: génération
  EN TS: Every generation is laughing under the apple tree.
  fr TS: Toutes les générations rient sous le pommier.
  EN FS: Every generation is laughing under the palm tree.
  fr FS: Toutes les générations rient sous le palmier.
  EN TP: generations in a garden
  fr TP: des générations dans un jardin
  EN FP: generations at a dinner table
  fr FP: des générations autour d'une table
4775 | newborn (adjective): born a very short time ago | loc: nouveau-né
  EN TS: The newborn has four fans already.
  fr TS: Le nouveau-né a déjà quatre fans.
  EN FS: The newborn has two fans already.
  fr FS: Le nouveau-né a déjà deux fans.
  EN TP: a newborn baby asleep
  fr TP: un bébé nouveau-né endormi
  EN FP: a newborn lamb
  fr FP: un agneau nouveau-né
4776 | polite (adjective): showing good manners towards other people | loc: poli
  EN TS: So polite: he is lifting his hat.
  fr TS: Si poli : il soulève son chapeau.
  EN FS: So polite: he is lifting his cane.
  fr FS: Si poli : il soulève sa canne.
  EN TP: a polite greeting
  fr TP: une salutation polie
  EN FP: a polite letter
  fr FP: une lettre polie
4777 | helpful (adjective): providing useful help to other people | loc: serviable
  EN TS: He is helpful to everyone.
  fr TS: Il est serviable avec tout le monde.
  EN FS: He is rude to everyone.
  fr FS: Il est grossier avec tout le monde.
  EN TP: a helpful old gentleman
  fr TP: un vieux monsieur serviable
  EN FP: a helpful young waiter
  fr FP: un jeune serveur serviable
4778 | workshop (noun): a small workplace where things are made | loc: atelier
  EN TS: This workshop produces clocks.
  fr TS: Cet atelier fabrique des horloges.
  EN FS: This workshop produces shoes.
  fr FS: Cet atelier fabrique des chaussures.
  EN TP: a small clock workshop
  fr TP: un petit atelier d'horlogerie
  EN FP: a small writing workshop
  fr FP: un petit atelier d'écriture
4779 | germany (noun): the country in central Europe, capital Berlin | loc: Allemagne
  EN TS: He is having fun in Germany!
  fr TS: Il s'éclate en Allemagne !
  EN FS: She is having fun in Germany!
  fr FS: Elle s'éclate en Allemagne !
  EN TP: a trip around Germany
  fr TP: un voyage à travers l'Allemagne
  EN FP: a job in Germany
  fr FP: un boulot en Allemagne
4780 | separate (adjective): independent, not joined to each other | loc: séparé
  EN TS: They are leaving through separate doors.
  fr TS: Ils sortent par des portes séparées.
  EN FS: They are leaving through the same door.
  fr FS: Ils sortent par la même porte.
  EN TP: two separate doors
  fr TP: deux portes séparées
  EN FP: two separate tables
  fr FP: deux tables séparées
4781 | marry (verb): to take someone as your husband or wife | loc: se marier
  EN TS: She is marrying him!
  fr TS: Elle se marie avec lui !
  EN FS: She is leaving him!
  fr FS: Elle le quitte !
  EN TP: to marry in a garden
  fr TP: se marier dans un jardin
  EN FP: to marry on a beach
  fr FP: se marier sur une plage
4782 | playground (noun): an open area where people go to play | loc: aire de jeux
  EN TS: She owns the playground!
  fr TS: Elle règne sur l'aire de jeux !
  EN FS: She owns the classroom!
  fr FS: Elle règne sur la salle de classe !
  EN TP: playing in the playground
  fr TP: jouer sur l'aire de jeux
  EN FP: an empty playground
  fr FP: une aire de jeux vide
4783 | couple (noun): two people in a romantic relationship | loc: couple
  EN TS: The couple is covered in cake!
  fr TS: Le couple est couvert de gâteau !
  EN FS: The couple is covered in mud!
  fr FS: Le couple est couvert de boue !
  EN TP: a couple with cake faces
  fr TP: un couple barbouillé de gâteau
  EN FP: a couple on a bike
  fr FP: un couple à vélo
4784 | give (verb): to cause someone to have something | loc: donner
  EN TS: He is giving her a present.
  fr TS: Il lui donne un cadeau.
  EN FS: He is giving her a phone.
  fr FS: Il lui donne un téléphone.
  EN TP: giving a wrapped present
  fr TP: donner un cadeau emballé
  EN FP: giving a big speech
  fr FP: donner un grand discours
4785 | terrace (noun): an open paved area outside a building | loc: terrasse
  EN TS: Cheers on the terrace!
  fr TS: Santé sur la terrasse !
  EN FS: Cheers in the kitchen!
  fr FS: Santé dans la cuisine !
  EN TP: juice on a sunny terrace
  fr TP: du jus sur une terrasse ensoleillée
  EN FP: a rooftop terrace party
  fr FP: une fête sur un toit-terrasse
4786 | sparkle (verb): to shine with many small flashing points | loc: scintiller
  EN TS: The sand is sparkling blue!
  fr TS: Le sable scintille en bleu !
  EN FS: The sand is sparkling red!
  fr FS: Le sable scintille en rouge !
  EN TP: sand sparkling at night
  fr TP: du sable qui scintille la nuit
  EN FP: sand sparkling in the sun
  fr FP: du sable qui scintille au soleil
4787 | valuable (adjective): worth a great amount of money or value | loc: précieux
  EN TS: This pan is very valuable.
  fr TS: Cette batée est très précieuse.
  EN FS: This pan is totally empty.
  fr FS: Cette batée est complètement vide.
  EN TP: a valuable pan of gold
  fr TP: une précieuse batée pleine d'or
  EN FP: a valuable old painting
  fr FP: un précieux vieux tableau
4788 | shocked (adjective): very surprised and upset by something bad | loc: choqué
  EN TS: Salon gossip. Everyone is shocked.
  fr TS: Potins au salon. Tout le monde est choqué.
  EN FS: Salon gossip. Everyone is bored.
  fr FS: Potins au salon. Tout le monde s'ennuie.
  EN TP: shocked by salon gossip
  fr TP: choqué par les potins du salon
  EN FP: shocked by the price
  fr FP: choqué par le prix
4789 | authority (noun): the power to give orders and make decisions | loc: autorité
  EN TS: She has full authority.
  fr TS: Elle a toute autorité.
  EN FS: He has full authority.
  fr FS: Il a toute autorité.
  EN TP: a woman with authority
  fr TP: une femme qui a de l'autorité
  EN FP: authority over an army
  fr FP: l'autorité sur une armée
4790 | conflict (noun): an open clash between two opposing sides | loc: conflit
  EN TS: Conflict at the big table, and papers are flying!
  fr TS: Conflit à la grande table, et les papiers volent !
  EN FS: Peace at the big table, and papers are flying!
  fr FS: Paix à la grande table, et les papiers volent !
  EN TP: a conflict at the table
  fr TP: un conflit à table
  EN FP: a conflict on the street
  fr FP: un conflit dans la rue
4791 | papers (noun): official writing that gives you information | loc: papiers
  EN TS: She is setting down papers.
  fr TS: Elle pose des papiers.
  EN FS: She is setting down flowers.
  fr FS: Elle pose des fleurs.
  EN TP: a folder of papers
  fr TP: un dossier plein de papiers
  EN FP: papers on the floor
  fr FP: des papiers par terre
4792 | to plant (verb): to put seeds or young plants into the ground | loc: planter
  EN TS: They are planting flowers.
  fr TS: Ils plantent des fleurs.
  EN FS: They are picking flowers.
  fr FS: Ils cueillent des fleurs.
  EN TP: planting a young flower
  fr TP: planter une jeune fleur
  EN FP: planting a flag
  fr FP: planter un drapeau
4793 | sand (verb): to rub something smooth with sandpaper | loc: poncer
  EN TS: They are sanding a birdhouse.
  fr TS: Ils poncent un nichoir.
  EN FS: They are painting a birdhouse.
  fr FS: Ils peignent un nichoir.
  EN TP: sanding a wooden roof
  fr TP: poncer un toit en bois
  EN FP: sanding a wooden floor
  fr FP: poncer un parquet
4794 | grandmother (noun): the mother of your mother or father | loc: grand-mère
  EN TS: Grandmother's cookies win.
  fr TS: Les cookies de grand-mère gagnent.
  EN FS: Grandmother's pizza wins.
  fr FS: La pizza de grand-mère gagne.
  EN TP: cookies from grandmother
  fr TP: des cookies de grand-mère
  EN FP: cookies from a shop
  fr FP: des cookies du magasin
4796 | balance (verb): to keep something steady so it does not fall | loc: tenir en équilibre
  EN TS: He is balancing two cards. Careful!
  fr TS: Il tient deux cartes en équilibre. Attention !
  EN FS: He is balancing two cups. Careful!
  fr FS: Il tient deux tasses en équilibre. Attention !
  EN TP: balancing playing cards
  fr TP: tenir des cartes en équilibre
  EN FP: balancing on one leg
  fr FP: tenir en équilibre sur une jambe
4797 | little (adjective): below average in number or quantity | loc: peu
  EN TS: He adds just a little cheese.
  fr TS: Il ajoute juste un peu de fromage.
  EN FS: He adds just a little sauce.
  fr FS: Il ajoute juste un peu de sauce.
  EN TP: a little extra cheese
  fr TP: un peu plus de fromage
  EN FP: a little extra pepper
  fr FP: un peu plus de poivre
4798 | temple (noun): a building where people pray | loc: temple
  EN TS: She is walking to a temple.
  fr TS: Elle marche vers un temple.
  EN FS: She is walking to a church.
  fr FS: Elle marche vers une église.
  EN TP: an old hilltop temple
  fr TP: un vieux temple sur une colline
  EN FP: an old hilltop castle
  fr FP: un vieux château sur une colline
4799 | tie (verb): to fasten something with a cord or string | loc: nouer
  EN TS: Tying a bow tie? Nervous work!
  fr TS: Nouer un nœud papillon ? Mission stress !
  EN FS: Tying his shoes? Nervous work!
  fr FS: Nouer ses lacets ? Mission stress !
  EN TP: tying a black bow tie
  fr TP: nouer un nœud papillon noir
  EN FP: tying up the suitcase
  fr FP: ficeler la valise
4800 | groom (noun): the man who is getting married at a wedding | loc: marié
  EN TS: The groom is so nervous!
  fr TS: Le marié est super nerveux !
  EN FS: The bride is so nervous!
  fr FS: La mariée est super nerveuse !
  EN TP: a nervous groom
  fr TP: un marié nerveux
  EN FP: a groom feeding a horse
  fr FP: un palefrenier qui nourrit un cheval
4801 | tall (adjective): great in height, from the ground up | loc: haut
  EN TS: This sunflower is so tall!
  fr TS: Ce tournesol est si haut !
  EN FS: This cactus is so tall!
  fr FS: Ce cactus est si haut !
  EN TP: a tall sunflower
  fr TP: un tournesol très haut
  EN FP: a tall tree
  fr FP: un arbre très haut
4802 | museum (noun): a building for displaying valuable old objects | loc: musée
  EN TS: This guard is the museum boss.
  fr TS: Ce gardien est le vrai boss du musée.
  EN FS: This cook is the museum boss.
  fr FS: Ce cuisinier est le vrai boss du musée.
  EN TP: a museum guard
  fr TP: un gardien de musée
  EN FP: a guard at a bank
  fr FP: un gardien de banque
4803 | bouquet (noun): a bunch of flowers arranged together | loc: bouquet
  EN TS: She brought a bouquet.
  fr TS: Elle a apporté un bouquet.
  EN FS: She brought a cake.
  fr FS: Elle a apporté un gâteau.
  EN TP: a bouquet for the host
  fr TP: un bouquet pour l'hôte
  EN FP: a bouquet for a bride
  fr FP: un bouquet pour une mariée
4805 | church (noun): a place where Christians go to worship | loc: église
  EN TS: He is pointing at a church.
  fr TS: Il montre une église du doigt.
  EN FS: He is pointing at a boat.
  fr FS: Il montre un bateau du doigt.
  EN TP: a domed church
  fr TP: une église à coupole
  EN FP: a wooden church
  fr FP: une église en bois
4806 | dome (noun): a round roof shaped like half a ball | loc: dôme
  EN TS: A dome is behind his book.
  fr TS: Un dôme se dresse derrière son livre.
  EN FS: A crane is behind his book.
  fr FS: Une grue se dresse derrière son livre.
  EN TP: a dome on the skyline
  fr TP: un dôme sur l'horizon
  EN FP: a dome tent for camping
  fr FP: une tente dôme de camping
4807 | orange (adjective): having the color between red and yellow | loc: orange
  EN TS: He is wearing an orange top.
  fr TS: Il porte un haut orange.
  EN FS: He is wearing an orange cap.
  fr FS: Il porte une casquette orange.
  EN TP: an orange sports top
  fr TP: un haut de sport orange
  EN FP: an orange sports car
  fr FP: une voiture de sport orange
4808 | braid (noun): hair woven into one plaited strand | loc: tresse
  EN TS: The stylist is making a braid.
  fr TS: La coiffeuse fait une tresse.
  EN FS: The stylist is making a bun.
  fr FS: La coiffeuse fait un chignon.
  EN TP: weaving a long braid
  fr TP: faire une longue tresse
  EN FP: cutting a long braid
  fr FP: couper une longue tresse
4809 | corridor (noun): a long narrow passage inside a building | loc: couloir
  EN TS: It's rush hour in the corridor.
  fr TS: C'est l'heure de pointe dans le couloir.
  EN FS: It's rush hour in the bathroom.
  fr FS: C'est l'heure de pointe dans la salle de bain.
  EN TP: a corridor full of shoes
  fr TP: un couloir plein de chaussures
  EN FP: a long hotel corridor
  fr FP: un long couloir d'hôtel
4810 | post (noun): a piece of timber fixed upright in the ground | loc: poteau
  EN TS: He is hammering a post in.
  fr TS: Il enfonce un poteau.
  EN FS: He is hammering a nail in.
  fr FS: Il enfonce un clou.
  EN TP: a post in the ground
  fr TP: un poteau dans le sol
  EN FP: a post on social media
  fr FP: une publication sur les réseaux
4811 | teammate (noun): someone who is on the same team as you | loc: coéquipier
  EN TS: The teammates are hyped up.
  fr TS: Les coéquipiers sont à bloc.
  EN FS: The teammates are fighting.
  fr FS: Les coéquipiers se battent.
  EN TP: hands in with teammates
  fr TP: mains au centre entre coéquipiers
  EN FP: arguing with teammates
  fr FP: se disputer avec ses coéquipiers
4812 | tidy (adjective): arranged neatly and in good order | loc: rangé
  EN TS: His wardrobe is super tidy.
  fr TS: Son armoire est super rangée.
  EN FS: His wardrobe is super messy.
  fr FS: Son armoire est super en bazar.
  EN TP: a tidy row of shirts
  fr TP: des chemises bien rangées
  EN FP: a tidy pile of shoes
  fr FP: des chaussures bien rangées
4814 | to pick (verb): to take leaves or fruit off a plant | loc: cueillir
  EN TS: The team is picking tomatoes.
  fr TS: L'équipe cueille des tomates.
  EN FS: The team is picking apples.
  fr FS: L'équipe cueille des pommes.
  EN TP: picking a red tomato
  fr TP: cueillir une tomate rouge
  EN FP: picking a red apple
  fr FP: cueillir une pomme rouge
4815 | rub (verb): to move your hand over something with pressure | loc: frotter
  EN TS: Office stress: rubbing her temples.
  fr TS: Stress au bureau : elle se frotte les tempes.
  EN FS: Office stress: rubbing her feet.
  fr FS: Stress au bureau : elle se frotte les pieds.
  EN TP: rubbing her temples
  fr TP: se frotter les tempes
  EN FP: rubbing her hands together
  fr FP: se frotter les mains
4816 | heart (noun): the muscular organ in your chest | loc: cœur
  EN TS: Her heart is racing!
  fr TS: Son cœur s'emballe !
  EN FS: Her heart is resting!
  fr FS: Son cœur est au repos !
  EN TP: a hand over the heart
  fr TP: une main sur le cœur
  EN FP: a heart on her shirt
  fr FP: un cœur sur son t-shirt
4817 | drought (noun): a long time with a shortage of rain | loc: sécheresse
  EN TS: Even the tree melts in this drought.
  fr TS: Même l'arbre fond avec cette sécheresse.
  EN FS: Even the dog melts in this drought.
  fr FS: Même le chien fond avec cette sécheresse.
  EN TP: a drought with cracked ground
  fr TP: une sécheresse et un sol craquelé
  EN FP: the end of a drought
  fr FP: la fin d'une sécheresse
4818 | heel (noun): the rounded back part of the foot | loc: talon
  EN TS: Spikes under the heel? Crazy!
  fr TS: Des pointes sous le talon ? Dingue !
  EN FS: Wheels under the heel? Crazy!
  fr FS: Des roues sous le talon ? Dingue !
  EN TP: a spike under the heel
  fr TP: une pointe sous le talon
  EN FP: the heel of a shoe
  fr FP: le talon d'une chaussure
4819 | grateful (adjective): feeling or showing thanks to someone | loc: reconnaissant
  EN TS: The old woman is grateful.
  fr TS: La vieille dame est reconnaissante.
  EN FS: The old man is grateful.
  fr FS: Le vieil homme est reconnaissant.
  EN TP: grateful for the umbrella
  fr TP: reconnaissante pour le parapluie
  EN FP: grateful for the taxi
  fr FP: reconnaissante pour le taxi
4820 | same (adjective): the same one, not a different one | loc: même
  EN TS: They have the same dress!
  fr TS: Elles ont la même robe !
  EN FS: They have the same bag!
  fr FS: Elles ont le même sac !
  EN TP: the same patterned dress
  fr TP: la même robe à motifs
  EN FP: the same shoes
  fr FP: les mêmes chaussures
4822 | message (noun): a short written or spoken communication | loc: message
  EN TS: The message made her so happy.
  fr TS: Le message l'a rendue si heureuse.
  EN FS: The message made her so sad.
  fr FS: Le message l'a rendue si triste.
  EN TP: reading a happy message
  fr TP: lire un message joyeux
  EN FP: a message on the fridge
  fr FP: un message sur le frigo
4823 | depth (noun): how far downward something goes | loc: profondeur
  EN TS: He is diving to a great depth.
  fr TS: Il plonge à une grande profondeur.
  EN FS: He is diving to a small depth.
  fr FS: Il plonge à une faible profondeur.
  EN TP: diving to a great depth
  fr TP: plonger à grande profondeur
  EN FP: the depth of a pool
  fr FP: la profondeur d'une piscine
4824 | pretend (verb): to make believe something is real | loc: faire semblant
  EN TS: Her horse is fake, but she pretends well.
  fr TS: Son cheval est faux, mais elle fait très bien semblant.
  EN FS: Her horse is fake, but she swims well.
  fr FS: Son cheval est faux, mais elle nage très bien.
  EN TP: pretending to ride a horse
  fr TP: faire semblant de monter à cheval
  EN FP: pretending to be asleep
  fr FP: faire semblant de dormir
4825 | to wipe (verb): to clean a surface by rubbing it with a cloth | loc: essuyer
  EN TS: Worktop wiped. Kitchen done.
  fr TS: Plan de travail essuyé. Cuisine terminée.
  EN FS: Window wiped. Kitchen done.
  fr FS: Fenêtre essuyée. Cuisine terminée.
  EN TP: wiping the white worktop
  fr TP: essuyer le plan de travail blanc
  EN FP: wiping away tears
  fr FP: essuyer ses larmes
4826 | dam (noun): a barrier built to hold back water | loc: barrage
  EN TS: The dam is overflowing!
  fr TS: Le barrage déborde !
  EN FS: The pool is overflowing!
  fr FS: La piscine déborde !
  EN TP: an overflowing dam
  fr TP: un barrage qui déborde
  EN FP: a dry dam in summer
  fr FP: un barrage à sec en été
4827 | paint (noun): a coloured substance you put on a surface | loc: peinture
  EN TS: This orange paint is thick.
  fr TS: Cette peinture orange est épaisse.
  EN FS: This blue paint is thick.
  fr FS: Cette peinture bleue est épaisse.
  EN TP: a thick slab of paint
  fr TP: une épaisse plaque de peinture
  EN FP: a fresh coat of paint
  fr FP: une couche de peinture fraîche
4828 | wall (noun): a flat side of a room, taller than its thickness | loc: mur
  EN TS: Half the wall is green now.
  fr TS: La moitié du mur est verte maintenant.
  EN FS: Half the wall is blue now.
  fr FS: La moitié du mur est bleue maintenant.
  EN TP: a half-green wall
  fr TP: un mur à moitié vert
  EN FP: a green garden wall
  fr FP: un mur de jardin vert
4829 | chip (noun): a small piece broken off something | loc: éclat
  EN TS: Paint chips are falling off.
  fr TS: Des éclats de peinture tombent.
  EN FS: Paint drops are falling off.
  fr FS: Des gouttes de peinture tombent.
  EN TP: chips of old paint
  fr TP: des éclats de vieille peinture
  EN FP: chips of old glass
  fr FP: des éclats de vieux verre
4830 | swim (verb): to move through water with your body | loc: nager
  EN TS: Two divers are swimming up.
  fr TS: Deux plongeurs nagent vers la surface.
  EN FS: Three divers are swimming up.
  fr FS: Trois plongeurs nagent vers la surface.
  EN TP: swimming up to the surface
  fr TP: nager vers la surface
  EN FP: to swim across the river
  fr FP: traverser la rivière à la nage
4831 | hit (noun): a successful stroke of the bat in baseball | loc: coup
  EN TS: What a big hit!
  fr TS: Quel beau coup !
  EN FS: What a big miss!
  fr FS: Quel beau raté !
  EN TP: a hit off a tee
  fr TP: un coup sur un tee
  EN FP: a hit on the radio
  fr FP: un tube à la radio
4832 | ridge (noun): the long top edge of a mountain or hill | loc: crête
  EN TS: A thin ridge above the clouds.
  fr TS: Une fine crête au-dessus des nuages.
  EN FS: A wide ridge above the clouds.
  fr FS: Une large crête au-dessus des nuages.
  EN TP: a thin snow ridge
  fr TP: une fine crête enneigée
  EN FP: a ridge of green hills
  fr FP: une crête de collines vertes
4834 | toy (noun): a thing designed to be played with | loc: jouet
  EN TS: This toy battle is epic!
  fr TS: Ce combat de jouets est épique !
  EN FS: This card battle is epic!
  fr FS: Ce combat de cartes est épique !
  EN TP: a spinning toy
  fr TP: un jouet qui tourne
  EN FP: a toy car
  fr FP: une voiture jouet
4836 | saw (verb): to cut something using a saw | loc: scier
  EN TS: He is sawing out a bear.
  fr TS: Il scie un ours dans le bois.
  EN FS: He is sawing out a horse.
  fr FS: Il scie un cheval dans le bois.
  EN TP: sawing a bear from wood
  fr TP: scier un ours dans du bois
  EN FP: sawing a plank in half
  fr FP: scier une planche en deux
4837 | table (noun): furniture with a flat top and legs | loc: table
  EN TS: The table is full of food.
  fr TS: La table est pleine de nourriture.
  EN FS: The table is full of books.
  fr FS: La table est pleine de livres.
  EN TP: a table full of food
  fr TP: une table pleine de nourriture
  EN FP: a table full of games
  fr FP: une table pleine de jeux
4838 | throw (verb): to send something through the air | loc: lancer
  EN TS: She is throwing a ball.
  fr TS: Elle lance un ballon.
  EN FS: She is kicking a ball.
  fr FS: Elle tape dans un ballon.
  EN TP: to throw a beach ball
  fr TP: lancer un ballon de plage
  EN FP: to throw a party
  fr FP: lancer une fête
4839 | move (verb): to change location, to travel or proceed | loc: bouger
  EN TS: He can move a car alone!
  fr TS: Il peut bouger une voiture tout seul !
  EN FS: He can move a bus alone!
  fr FS: Il peut bouger un bus tout seul !
  EN TP: moving heavy things
  fr TP: bouger des trucs lourds
  EN FP: moving to a new city
  fr FP: déménager dans une nouvelle ville
4840 | hide (verb): to keep yourself or something from being seen | loc: cacher
  EN TS: They hid for a surprise!
  fr TS: Ils se sont cachés pour une surprise !
  EN FS: They hid from a dog!
  fr FS: Ils se sont cachés d'un chien !
  EN TP: hiding behind the sofa
  fr TP: se cacher derrière le canapé
  EN FP: hiding under the bed
  fr FP: se cacher sous le lit
4841 | key (noun): a small metal device that turns in a lock | loc: clé
  EN TS: She found the key! Finally!
  fr TS: Elle a trouvé la clé ! Enfin !
  EN FS: She found the phone! Finally!
  fr FS: Elle a trouvé le téléphone ! Enfin !
  EN TP: finding a small key
  fr TP: trouver une petite clé
  EN FP: losing a small key
  fr FP: perdre une petite clé
4842 | to work (verb): to do physical or mental work for a purpose | loc: travailler
  EN TS: He is working on an old car.
  fr TS: Il travaille sur une vieille voiture.
  EN FS: He is working on an old bike.
  fr FS: Il travaille sur un vieux vélo.
  EN TP: working on a car engine
  fr TP: travailler sur un moteur de voiture
  EN FP: working in an office
  fr FP: travailler dans un bureau
4843 | structure (noun): a thing built from many parts | loc: structure
  EN TS: That is one big wooden structure!
  fr TS: Ça, c'est une sacrée structure en bois !
  EN FS: That is one big metal structure!
  fr FS: Ça, c'est une sacrée structure en métal !
  EN TP: a wooden house structure
  fr TP: une structure de maison en bois
  EN FP: the structure of a sentence
  fr FP: la structure d'une phrase
4845 | cloth (noun): material made by weaving or knitting fibers | loc: tissu
  EN TS: Hands are sewing the cloth.
  fr TS: Des mains cousent le tissu.
  EN FS: Hands are cutting the cloth.
  fr FS: Des mains coupent le tissu.
  EN TP: stitching the cloth
  fr TP: coudre le tissu
  EN FP: wiping with a cloth
  fr FP: essuyer avec un tissu
4846 | iron (verb): to press clothes smooth with a hot iron | loc: repasser
  EN TS: Ironing done: one flat sheet.
  fr TS: C'est repassé : un drap tout plat.
  EN FS: Ironing done: one flat towel.
  fr FS: C'est repassé : une serviette toute plate.
  EN TP: ironing a white sheet
  fr TP: repasser un drap blanc
  EN FP: ironing out a problem
  fr FP: repasser un examen
4847 | floor (noun): the flat inside surface of a room you walk on | loc: sol
  EN TS: What a clean floor!
  fr TS: Quel sol impeccable !
  EN FS: What a dirty floor!
  fr FS: Quel sol dégoûtant !
  EN TP: mopping the floor
  fr TP: laver le sol
  EN FP: painting the floor
  fr FP: peindre le sol
4848 | grow (verb): to get bigger gradually, the way a plant does | loc: pousser
  EN TS: Look what she grew: a pumpkin!
  fr TS: Regardez ce qu'elle a fait pousser : une citrouille !
  EN FS: Look what she grew: a melon!
  fr FS: Regardez ce qu'elle a fait pousser : un melon !
  EN TP: growing a big pumpkin
  fr TP: faire pousser une grosse citrouille
  EN FP: growing a long beard
  fr FP: se laisser pousser la barbe
4849 | summer (noun): the warmest season of the year | loc: été
  EN TS: Summer: water for everyone!
  fr TS: L'été : de l'eau pour tout le monde !
  EN FS: Summer: cake for everyone!
  fr FS: L'été : du gâteau pour tout le monde !
  EN TP: a summer garden sprinkler
  fr TP: un arroseur de jardin en été
  EN FP: a summer beach day
  fr FP: une journée d'été à la plage
4850 | camera (noun): the equipment you use for taking photographs | loc: appareil photo
  EN TS: He is pointing a camera at us!
  fr TS: Il braque un appareil photo sur nous !
  EN FS: He is pointing a phone at us!
  fr FS: Il braque un téléphone sur nous !
  EN TP: a camera on a tripod
  fr TP: un appareil photo sur un trépied
  EN FP: a camera in a shop
  fr FP: un appareil photo en magasin
4851 | ancient (adjective): very old, from thousands of years ago | loc: antique
  EN TS: She found an ancient tablet!
  fr TS: Elle a trouvé une tablette antique !
  EN FS: She found an ancient sword!
  fr FS: Elle a trouvé une épée antique !
  EN TP: an ancient stone tablet
  fr TP: une tablette de pierre antique
  EN FP: an ancient ship
  fr FP: un navire antique
4852 | gear (noun): a toothed wheel that turns inside a machine | loc: engrenage
  EN TS: Huge gears at the end!
  fr TS: D'énormes engrenages au bout !
  EN FS: Tiny gears at the end!
  fr FS: De minuscules engrenages au bout !
  EN TP: huge interlocking gears
  fr TP: d'énormes engrenages imbriqués
  EN FP: bike gears
  fr FP: les engrenages d'un vélo
4853 | tiny (adjective): very, very small | loc: minuscule
  EN TS: That cog is super tiny.
  fr TS: Ce rouage est super minuscule.
  EN FS: That screw is super tiny.
  fr FS: Cette vis est super minuscule.
  EN TP: a tiny brass cog
  fr TP: un minuscule rouage en laiton
  EN FP: a tiny kitchen
  fr FP: une minuscule cuisine
4854 | solve (verb): to find the solution to a problem | loc: résoudre
  EN TS: He is solving a huge problem!
  fr TS: Il résout un énorme problème !
  EN FS: He is solving a tiny problem!
  fr FS: Il résout un tout petit problème !
  EN TP: solving maths on a board
  fr TP: résoudre des maths au tableau
  EN FP: solving a crime
  fr FP: résoudre un crime
4856 | teacher (noun): a person whose job is teaching | loc: professeur
  EN TS: The teacher is behind a wall of paper.
  fr TS: Le professeur est derrière un mur de papier.
  EN FS: The teacher is behind a wall of books.
  fr FS: Le professeur est derrière un mur de livres.
  EN TP: a teacher marking papers
  fr TP: un professeur qui corrige des copies
  EN FP: a teacher reading a book
  fr FP: un professeur qui lit un livre
4857 | worker (noun): a person who works at a job | loc: ouvrier
  EN TS: The worker shook it, and now it works!
  fr TS: L'ouvrier l'a secoué, et maintenant ça marche !
  EN FS: The worker kicked it, and now it works!
  fr FS: L'ouvrier lui a mis un coup de pied, et maintenant ça marche !
  EN TP: a worker with a scanner
  fr TP: un ouvrier avec un scanner
  EN FP: a worker with a hammer
  fr FP: un ouvrier avec un marteau
4858 | spiral (noun): a shape that curves round and round from a centre | loc: spirale
  EN TS: His domino spiral is enormous!
  fr TS: Sa spirale de dominos est énorme !
  EN FS: His domino tower is enormous!
  fr FS: Sa tour de dominos est énorme !
  EN TP: a spiral of dominoes
  fr TP: une spirale de dominos
  EN FP: a spiral notebook
  fr FP: un cahier à spirale
4859 | piece (noun): a separate part of something bigger | loc: morceau
  EN TS: The pieces took over the room.
  fr TS: Les morceaux ont envahi la pièce.
  EN FS: The toys took over the room.
  fr FS: Les jouets ont envahi la pièce.
  EN TP: fitting puzzle pieces
  fr TP: assembler des morceaux de puzzle
  EN FP: a piece of cake
  fr FP: un morceau de gâteau
4860 | bubble (noun): a small ball of gas inside a liquid | loc: bulle
  EN TS: The tablet makes bubbles.
  fr TS: Le comprimé fait des bulles.
  EN FS: The tablet makes sparks.
  fr FS: Le comprimé fait des étincelles.
  EN TP: bubbles in a glass
  fr TP: des bulles dans un verre
  EN FP: a bubble of chewing gum
  fr FP: une bulle de chewing-gum
4861 | listen (verb): to hear something on purpose | loc: écouter
  EN TS: Shh, she is listening!
  fr TS: Chut, elle écoute !
  EN FS: Shh, she is sleeping!
  fr FS: Chut, elle dort !
  EN TP: listening to a bird
  fr TP: écouter un oiseau
  EN FP: listening to a teacher
  fr FP: écouter un prof
4862 | choose (verb): to pick one thing from several choices | loc: choisir
  EN TS: She can't choose a pumpkin.
  fr TS: Elle n'arrive pas à choisir une citrouille.
  EN FS: She can't choose a hat.
  fr FS: Elle n'arrive pas à choisir un chapeau.
  EN TP: choosing between two apples
  fr TP: choisir entre deux pommes
  EN FP: choosing between two dresses
  fr FP: choisir entre deux robes
4863 | plan (noun): a series of steps to reach a goal | loc: plan
  EN TS: Her plan fills the whole wall.
  fr TS: Son plan couvre tout le mur.
  EN FS: Her plan fills the whole desk.
  fr FS: Son plan couvre tout le bureau.
  EN TP: a plan on the wall
  fr TP: un plan sur le mur
  EN FP: a plan for a house
  fr FP: un plan de maison
4864 | uniform (noun): clothing a group wears to be identified | loc: uniforme
  EN TS: The band is in uniform!
  fr TS: La fanfare est en uniforme !
  EN FS: The band is in pyjamas!
  fr FS: La fanfare est en pyjama !
  EN TP: a band in uniform
  fr TP: une fanfare en uniforme
  EN FP: a school uniform
  fr FP: un uniforme scolaire
4865 | lens (noun): the round glass in glasses or a camera | loc: lentille | checker: word_missing? | translator note: loc "lentille" is the glasses/contact lens; a camera lens is "objectif"
  EN TS: His camera has a long lens.
  fr TS: Son appareil photo a un long objectif.
  EN FS: His camera has a short lens.
  fr FS: Son appareil photo a un objectif court.
  EN TP: a long camera lens
  fr TP: un long objectif photo
  EN FP: a lens in her glasses
  fr FP: un verre de lunettes
4866 | drone (noun): a small flying machine with a camera | loc: drone
  EN TS: A drone is hovering low. Nice shot!
  fr TS: Un drone vole au ras du sol. Joli plan !
  EN FS: A bird is hovering low. Nice shot!
  fr FS: Un oiseau vole au ras du sol. Joli plan !
  EN TP: a drone over the grass
  fr TP: un drone au-dessus de l'herbe
  EN FP: a drone in the studio
  fr FP: un drone dans le studio
4868 | program (verb): to write a computer program | loc: programmer
  EN TS: They programmed it. It works!
  fr TS: Ils l'ont programmé. Ça marche !
  EN FS: They programmed it. It broke!
  fr FS: Ils l'ont programmé. Ça a planté !
  EN TP: programming a new app
  fr TP: programmer une nouvelle appli
  EN FP: programming a washing machine
  fr FP: programmer une machine à laver
4869 | design (noun): working out the form of something in a sketch | loc: design
  EN TS: Design is her whole life.
  fr TS: Le design, c'est toute sa vie.
  EN FS: Football is her whole life.
  fr FS: Le foot, c'est toute sa vie.
  EN TP: a logo design
  fr TP: un design de logo
  EN FP: a tattoo design
  fr FP: un design de tatouage
4870 | foam (noun): the mass of small white bubbles on waves | loc: écume | checker: word_missing? | translator note: loc "écume" is sea foam only; shaving foam on a face is "mousse"
  EN TS: His face is covered in foam.
  fr TS: Son visage est couvert de mousse.
  EN FS: His face is covered in mud.
  fr FS: Son visage est couvert de boue.
  EN TP: foam on his cheek
  fr TP: de la mousse sur sa joue
  EN FP: foam on a beer
  fr FP: de la mousse sur une bière
4871 | registration (noun): the act of signing up or enrolling | loc: inscription
  EN TS: The registration queue is endless.
  fr TS: La file d'inscription est interminable.
  EN FS: The registration queue is empty.
  fr FS: La file d'inscription est vide.
  EN TP: a registration desk
  fr TP: un guichet d'inscription
  EN FP: a car registration plate
  fr FP: une plaque d'immatriculation
4872 | rating (noun): a score showing the value of something | loc: note
  EN TS: Such a "strict" rating: always five stars.
  fr TS: Une note tellement « sévère » : toujours cinq étoiles.
  EN FS: Such a "strict" rating: always one star.
  fr FS: Une note tellement « sévère » : toujours une étoile.
  EN TP: a five-star rating
  fr TP: une note de cinq étoiles
  EN FP: a one-star rating
  fr FP: une note d'une étoile
4873 | study (noun): using your mind to learn a subject by reading | loc: étude
  EN TS: She is lost in study.
  fr TS: Elle est absorbée par l'étude.
  EN FS: She is lost in a forest.
  fr FS: Elle est perdue dans une forêt.
  EN TP: deep in study
  fr TP: plongée dans l'étude
  EN FP: a medical study
  fr FP: une étude médicale
4874 | traffic light (noun): the lights that tell cars to stop and go | loc: feu de circulation
  EN TS: She stopped at a traffic light.
  fr TS: Elle s'est arrêtée à un feu de circulation.
  EN FS: She stopped at a busy gas station.
  fr FS: Elle s'est arrêtée à une station-service animée.
  EN TP: stopped at a traffic light
  fr TP: arrêtée à un feu de circulation
  EN FP: a red traffic light
  fr FP: un feu de circulation rouge
4875 | truck (noun): a big road vehicle for hauling things | loc: camion
  EN TS: The team is loading the truck.
  fr TS: L'équipe charge le camion.
  EN FS: The team is loading the boat.
  fr FS: L'équipe charge le bateau.
  EN TP: a truck full of boxes
  fr TP: un camion plein de cartons
  EN FP: a truck full of sand
  fr FP: un camion plein de sable
4876 | smile (verb): to spread your lips to show you are pleased | loc: sourire
  EN TS: Rain, but she is smiling.
  fr TS: Il pleut, mais elle sourit.
  EN FS: Rain, but she is crying.
  fr FS: Il pleut, mais elle pleure.
  EN TP: smiling at a puppy
  fr TP: sourire à un chiot
  EN FP: smiling at the bus driver
  fr FP: sourire au chauffeur de bus
4877 | sit (verb): to be seated | loc: s'asseoir | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Now everybody is sitting!
  fr TS: Maintenant, tout le monde est assis !
  EN FS: Now everybody is standing!
  fr FS: Maintenant, tout le monde est debout !
  EN TP: sitting in a full hall
  fr TP: assis dans une salle pleine
  EN FP: sitting in an empty bus
  fr FP: assis dans un bus vide
4878 | pier (noun): a wooden platform built out over the water | loc: ponton
  EN TS: This guy is diving off the pier.
  fr TS: Ce mec plonge du ponton.
  EN FS: This guy is diving off the boat.
  fr FS: Ce mec plonge du bateau.
  EN TP: diving off a wooden pier
  fr TP: plonger d'un ponton en bois
  EN FP: fishing off a wooden pier
  fr FP: pêcher sur un ponton en bois
4880 | bottle (noun): a plastic or glass container for liquids | loc: bouteille
  EN TS: A water bottle off the roof? Wild.
  fr TS: Une bouteille d'eau lancée du toit ? Dingue.
  EN FS: A chair off the roof? Totally wild.
  fr FS: Une chaise lancée du toit ? Complètement dingue.
  EN TP: a big water bottle
  fr TP: une grande bouteille d'eau
  EN FP: a baby's milk bottle
  fr FP: une bouteille de lait pour bébé
4881 | bus (noun): a vehicle that carries many passengers | loc: bus
  EN TS: People are pushing a bus!
  fr TS: Des gens poussent un bus !
  EN FS: People are pushing a train!
  fr FS: Des gens poussent un train !
  EN TP: pushing a city bus
  fr TP: pousser un bus de ville
  EN FP: catching a city bus
  fr FP: prendre un bus de ville
4882 | aircraft (noun): a vehicle that can fly | loc: aéronef
  EN TS: They are pulling an aircraft!
  fr TS: Ils tirent un aéronef !
  EN FS: They are pulling a truck!
  fr FS: Ils tirent un camion !
  EN TP: pulling a huge aircraft
  fr TP: tirer un énorme aéronef
  EN FP: an aircraft taking off
  fr FP: un aéronef qui décolle
4883 | reveal (verb): to make something visible for everyone to see | loc: révéler | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The doors reveal green hills.
  fr TS: Les portes révèlent des collines vertes.
  EN FS: The doors reveal a blue sea.
  fr FS: Les portes révèlent une mer bleue.
  EN TP: revealing a green valley
  fr TP: révéler une vallée verte
  EN FP: revealing a secret
  fr FP: révéler un secret
4884 | point (verb): to indicate a direction or thing with your finger | loc: pointer
  EN TS: Everybody is pointing up!
  fr TS: Tout le monde pointe vers le haut !
  EN FS: Everybody is pointing down!
  fr FS: Tout le monde pointe vers le bas !
  EN TP: pointing at the sky
  fr TP: pointer le ciel du doigt
  EN FP: pointing at a map
  fr FP: pointer une carte du doigt
4885 | street (noun): a road in a town lined with buildings | loc: rue
  EN TS: They are going up the street.
  fr TS: Ils montent la rue.
  EN FS: They are going up the stairs.
  fr FS: Ils montent l'escalier.
  EN TP: a sunny cobbled street
  fr TP: une rue pavée ensoleillée
  EN FP: a busy shopping street
  fr FP: une rue commerçante animée
4886 | steep (adjective): rising or falling very sharply, almost straight | loc: abrupt
  EN TS: The path is so steep.
  fr TS: Le chemin est tellement abrupt.
  EN FS: The path is so flat.
  fr FS: Le chemin est tellement plat.
  EN TP: a steep grassy path
  fr TP: un chemin herbeux abrupt
  EN FP: a steep price
  fr FP: un escalier abrupt
4887 | narrow (adjective): not wide, small from side to side | loc: étroit
  EN TS: Whoa, this path is narrow!
  fr TS: Waouh, ce chemin est étroit !
  EN FS: Whoa, this path is wide!
  fr FS: Waouh, ce chemin est large !
  EN TP: a narrow canyon path
  fr TP: un chemin étroit dans un canyon
  EN FP: a narrow shop door
  fr FP: une porte de magasin étroite
4888 | barefoot (adjective): wearing nothing on your feet | loc: pieds nus
  EN TS: Everyone is walking barefoot!
  fr TS: Tout le monde marche pieds nus !
  EN FS: Everyone is running barefoot!
  fr FS: Tout le monde court pieds nus !
  EN TP: walking barefoot on the sand
  fr TP: marcher pieds nus sur le sable
  EN FP: barefoot on hot stones
  fr FP: pieds nus sur des pierres chaudes
4889 | circular (adjective): having the shape of a circle | loc: circulaire
  EN TS: The platform is circular.
  fr TS: La plateforme est circulaire.
  EN FS: The platform is square.
  fr FS: La plateforme est carrée.
  EN TP: a circular white platform
  fr TP: une plateforme blanche circulaire
  EN FP: a circular letter
  fr FP: une lettre circulaire
4890 | circle (verb): to travel around something in a ring | loc: tourner autour
  EN TS: Everyone is circling the top.
  fr TS: Tout le monde tourne autour de la toupie.
  EN FS: Everyone is circling the tree.
  fr FS: Tout le monde tourne autour de l'arbre.
  EN TP: circling a spinning top
  fr TP: tourner autour d'une toupie
  EN FP: circling a football
  fr FP: tourner autour d'un ballon de foot
4892 | shorts (noun): trousers that end above the knee | loc: short
  EN TS: Those swim shorts are so fast!
  fr TS: Ce short de bain est trop rapide !
  EN FS: Those swim fins are so fast!
  fr FS: Ces palmes sont trop rapides !
  EN TP: colourful swim shorts
  fr TP: un short de bain coloré
  EN FP: shorts for football
  fr FP: un short de foot
4893 | crowded (adjective): uncomfortably full of people | loc: bondé
  EN TS: Crowded to the very top!
  fr TS: Bondé jusqu'en haut !
  EN FS: Crowded only at the bottom!
  fr FS: Bondé seulement en bas !
  EN TP: a crowded baseball stadium
  fr TP: un stade de baseball bondé
  EN FP: a crowded bus at night
  fr FP: un bus bondé la nuit
4894 | still (adjective): completely without movement, like flat water | loc: calme
  EN TS: Everyone is still. Very normal.
  fr TS: Tout le monde est calme et immobile. Tout à fait normal.
  EN FS: Everyone is dancing. Very normal.
  fr FS: Tout le monde danse. Tout à fait normal.
  EN TP: still students in a hall
  fr TP: des étudiants calmes dans une salle
  EN FP: still water in a lake
  fr FP: l'eau calme d'un lac
4895 | opposite (adjective): directly across from each other | loc: opposé
  EN TS: They stand on opposite sides.
  fr TS: Ils sont sur des côtés opposés.
  EN FS: They stand on the same side.
  fr FS: Ils sont du même côté.
  EN TP: on opposite sides
  fr TP: sur des côtés opposés
  EN FP: the opposite direction
  fr FP: la direction opposée
4896 | shadow (noun): the dark shape you make by blocking light | loc: ombre
  EN TS: Everyone has a long shadow!
  fr TS: Tout le monde a une grande ombre !
  EN FS: Everyone has a long scarf!
  fr FS: Tout le monde a une grande écharpe !
  EN TP: long shadows on stones
  fr TP: de longues ombres sur les pierres
  EN FP: shadows on a wall
  fr FP: des ombres sur un mur
4897 | join (verb): to become part of a group | loc: rejoindre
  EN TS: Everyone is joining the hug!
  fr TS: Tout le monde rejoint le câlin !
  EN FS: Everyone is joining the dance!
  fr FS: Tout le monde rejoint la danse !
  EN TP: joining a group hug
  fr TP: rejoindre un câlin collectif
  EN FP: joining a dance class
  fr FP: rejoindre un cours de danse
4898 | panel (noun): a flat sheet that forms part of something | loc: panneau
  EN TS: They are fitting glass panels.
  fr TS: Ils posent des panneaux de verre.
  EN FS: They are fitting wood panels.
  fr FS: Ils posent des panneaux de bois.
  EN TP: fitting glass panels
  fr TP: poser des panneaux de verre
  EN FP: cleaning glass panels
  fr FP: nettoyer des panneaux de verre
4899 | enormous (adjective): extremely big | loc: énorme
  EN TS: That radish is enormous, dude!
  fr TS: Ce radis est énorme, mec !
  EN FS: That melon is enormous, dude!
  fr FS: Ce melon est énorme, mec !
  EN TP: an enormous white radish
  fr TP: un énorme radis blanc
  EN FP: an enormous pumpkin
  fr FP: une énorme citrouille
4900 | stack (noun): a neat pile of things placed on top of each other | loc: pile
  EN TS: The tall stack fell over!
  fr TS: La haute pile s'est effondrée !
  EN FS: The tall tree fell over!
  fr FS: Le grand arbre s'est effondré !
  EN TP: a tall stack of pallets
  fr TP: une haute pile de palettes
  EN FP: a stack of pancakes
  fr FP: une pile de crêpes
4901 | blue (adjective): the color between green and violet | loc: bleu
  EN TS: Blue sea, blue sky, big dive.
  fr TS: Mer bleue, ciel bleu, gros plongeon.
  EN FS: Blue pool, blue sky, big dive.
  fr FS: Piscine bleue, ciel bleu, gros plongeon.
  EN TP: diving into blue water
  fr TP: plonger dans l'eau bleue
  EN FP: diving into a blue pool
  fr FP: plonger dans une piscine bleue
4902 | submarine (noun): a warship that travels under water | loc: sous-marin
  EN TS: A submarine, then a whale. Swim faster!
  fr TS: Un sous-marin, puis une baleine. Nage plus vite !
  EN FS: A submarine, then a shark. Swim faster!
  fr FS: Un sous-marin, puis un requin. Nage plus vite !
  EN TP: a submarine in a lake
  fr TP: un sous-marin dans un lac
  EN FP: a submarine in a harbour
  fr FP: un sous-marin dans un port
4903 | crowd (verb): to gather closely in large numbers | loc: se masser
  EN TS: Everyone is crowding the plaza. Why?
  fr TS: Tout le monde se masse sur la place. Pourquoi ?
  EN FS: Cars are crowding the plaza. Why?
  fr FS: Des voitures se massent sur la place. Pourquoi ?
  EN TP: crowding into the square
  fr TP: se masser sur la place
  EN FP: crowding around a stage
  fr FP: se masser autour d'une scène
